Lean Manufacturing - Books on Google Play                                            Cookies help us deliver our services. By using our services, you agree to our use of cookiesLearn moreGot itMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsSearch             Apps       My apps     Shop      Games     Family     Editors' Choice            Movies & TV       My movies & TV     Shop      TV     Family     Studios     Networks            Music       My music     Shop            Books       My books     Shop      Comics     Textbooks     Children's Books            Newsstand       My newsstand     Shop            Devices       Shop            Entertainment          Account     Redeem     Buy gift card     My wishlist     My Play activity     Parent Guide                  Genres              Arts & Entertainment  Biographies & Memoirs  Books in Spanish  Business & Investing  Computers & Technology  Cooking, Food & Wine  Education  Engineering  Fiction & Literature  Health, Mind & Body  History  Home & Garden  Law  Medicine  Mystery & Thrillers  Parenting & Families  Politics & Current Events  Religion & Spirituality  Romance  Science & Math  Science Fiction & Fantasy  Sports  Textbooks  Travel  Young Adult       Comics    General  Crime & Mystery  Fantasy  Horror  Literary  Manga  Media Tie-In  Science Fiction  Superheroes       Children's Books    Ages 5 & Under  Ages 6-8  Ages 9-12  Action & Adventure  Animals & Nature  Comics  Early Learning  Education  Fiction  Growing Up  History & Biographies  Mysteries  Science Fiction & Fantasy  Sports                        Home            Top Charts            New Arrivals                                       Settings      Android Device Manager                        Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them          William M Feld    September 28, 2000   CRC Press                       Add to Wishlist   Adding...   Added to Wishlist   Remove   Removing...      Item added to wishlist.     Item removed from wishlist.      0             There are some very good books available that explain the Lean Manufacturing theory and touch on implementing its techniques. However, you cannot learn "how to be" lean from merely reading the theory. And to be successful in the real-work environment you need a clear comprehension of how lean techniques work, rather than just a remote understanding of what they are. You need to know what does and does not work in different situations. And you need the benefit of practical experience in their implementation.Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them gives you the benefit of author and practitioner William Feld's 15 years of hands-on experience - and the lessons he's learned. Feld provides insight into the appropriate use of assessment, analysis, design, and, most importantly, deployment of a successful lean manufacturing program. Packed with practical advice and tips but not bogged down in theory, this book covers how, why, when, and what to do while implementing lean manufacturing. It equips you with the tools and techniques you need along with an understanding of how and why they work. Feld explores why an integrated approach is so much more beneficial in securing sustained improvement. He focuses on the interdependency of the Five Primary Elements: organization, metrics, logistics, manufacturing flow, and process control. He describes a proven, applied approach to creating a lean program using these elements. To keep up globally, and even locally, your manufacturing operation must be responsive, flexible, predictable, and consistent. You must continually improve manufacturing operations and cultivate a self directed work force driven by output based, customer performance criteria. By applying what you learn from Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them you can build a workforce - and an organization - with the capacity to satisfy world class expectations now and into the future.      Read more                 My review                                  Review from                                            Reviews      Write a Review      Edit Review          Review deleted         Additional information     Features Flowing text   Best for Web, Tablet, Phone   Pages  248    Language English   ISBN 9781420025538   Genres   Business & Economics / Industries / Manufacturing  Technology & Engineering / Engineering (General)  Technology & Engineering / Manufacturing     Read more    Content protection This content is DRM protected.   Read Aloud Available on Android devices   Report  Flag as inappropriate          Reading information     Smartphones and Tablets   Install the  Google Play Books app  for  Android  and  iPad/iPhone . It syncs automatically with your account and allows you to read online or offline wherever you are.   Laptops and Computers   You can read books purchased on Google Play using your computer's web browser.     eReaders and other devices   To read on e-ink devices like the Sony eReader or Barnes & Noble Nook, you'll need to download a file and transfer it to your device. Please follow the detailed  Help center  instructions to transfer the files to supported eReaders.           Similar   See more                   Pre-ordered           The Lean Certification Handbook: A Guide to the Bronze Certification Body of Knowledge    Anthony Manos June 29, 2012    2  $129.00 $103.20       This handbooks intention is to gather into a single reference the information related to the joint lean certification program of SME, AME, The Shingo Prize, and ASQ. This book will enhance your understanding of the certifications Body of Knowledge (BOK) as a whole and give you a more holistic look at lean. This comprehensive handbook covers all the topics included in the BOK: cultural enablers, continuous process improvement, consistent lean enterprise culture, and business results. Written by a team of lean experts with years of experience in the field, it will be indispensible to anyone interested in implementing and sustaining a lean initiative. The book is written, by design, at the Bronze Level for certification knowledge. This means that the weightings used in the Lean BOK for the Bronze Certification were considered for the depth and breadth of material considered for each rubric. By addressing the Lean BOK at the Bronze Level, this book provides a basic understanding of the lean principles, systems, and tools at a tactical level to drive improvements with measureable results. Material from several lean practitioners with differing backgrounds and experience has been gathered to create this handbook, which serves as an ideal starting point for practitioners who want both a holistic view of lean in general and also specifically the BOK of this groundbreaking joint certification program.             2  $129.00 $103.20                      Pre-ordered           The Small Manufacturer's Toolkit: A Guide to Selecting the Techniques and Systems to Help You Win    Stephen Novak August 23, 2005    2  $93.95 $69.71       Small manufacturers often lack the resources and expertise needed to choose the management philosophies and process improvement techniques that could provide the most benefit to their bottom line. Sorting through all of the available tools and deciding which ones to adopt can be overwhelming. The Small Manufacturer's Toolkit: A Guide to Selecting the Techniques and Systems to Help You Win guides you through the philosophies that are constantly being promoted, enabling you make informed choices. Following an introductory chapter, the author addresses fundamental inventory management and planning tools, including the Sales Operations Planning process that bridges the high-level strategic plan and the midrange master production schedule. The book then discusses Lean Manufacturing and the often accompanying Six Sigma, as well as the aspects of the Theory of Constraints that may cause confusion and prevent implementation. The book reviews many of the most popular quality tools and quality management systems, fostering an understanding of what should be the foundation of any organization. The text also explores project management, and examines the requirements surrounding the implementation and use of ERP systems. It emphasizes awareness and application of Supply Chain Management techniques, and covers productive E-Commerce related applications. The book concludes by providing a diagnostic tool that helps you determine which tools, or aspects of tools, are valid for your organization.             2  $93.95 $69.71                      Pre-ordered           Story of a Lean Journey    James K. Lewis January 1, 2008    2  $18.40 $9.99       Allison Manufacturing Services (AMS) is a small manufacturer struggling to survive global competition and specialization. Looking for a way to save the company, the board hires Bill Watts, a lean consultant, as its new executive vice president. This book takes readers through the first three-years of lean application at AMS.                  2  $18.40 $9.99                      Pre-ordered           Lean Production for the Small Company    Mike Elbert August 28, 2012    2  $54.95 $43.41       A hands-on guide to adapting Lean principles and the Toyota Production System to high-mix/low-volume environments, Lean Production for the Small Company uses charts, pictures, and easy-to-understand language to describe the methods needed to improve processes and eliminate waste. It walks readers through the correct order of implementation and describes problems and pitfalls along with time-tested solutions.   Explaining how to incorporate existing systems into a Lean strategy, the book starts with the fundamentals and builds on them to describe the full range of tools and processes needed to implement Lean. It outlines how to design factories for Lean manufacturing and demonstrates how to remove variations within business and manufacturing processes to achieve a smooth continuous flow of product that delivers your product on time to customers.   The tools, methods, and ideals discussed are applicable in any industry and all parts of your business—from manufacturing and sales to human resources. The text unveils new methods and tools that can help you reduce inventory, improve inventory turns, and facilitate raw material flow through the factory. It details how to use customer order demands to schedule the production floor, rather than using estimated production schedules. It also considers the accounting process and explains how to improve your cash-to-cash cycle time.   Drawing on the author’s decades of experience transforming high-mix plants to Lean, the text brings together coverage of the tools and processes that have made Toyota so successful. All the chapters in this book, when implemented, will result in a culture change that will transform your company into a learning organization that continuously eliminates waste and improves its processes.              2  $54.95 $43.41                      Pre-ordered           Transactional Six Sigma and Lean Servicing: Leveraging Manufacturing Concepts to Achieve World-Class Service    Betsi Harris Ehrlich June 13, 2002    2  $109.95 $87.96       Service industries have traditionally lagged manufacturing in adoption of quality management strategies and Six Sigma is no exception. While there are a growing number of books on applying the hot topics of Six Sigma and Lean Manufacturing concepts in a manufacturing environment, there has not been a mainstream book that applies these techniques in a service environment, until now. Transactional Six Sigma and Lean ServicingTM: Leveraging Manufacturing Concepts to Achieve World Class Service is a ground breaking "how-to" book that serves as a practical guide for implementing Six Sigma and Lean Manufacturing methods in a transactional service oriented environment. It uses real case studies and examples to show how Six Sigma and Lean ServicingTM techniques have been implemented and proven effective in achieving substantial documented results. Lean ServicingTM is the author's own term used to describe the application of Lean Manufacturing concepts to transactional and service processes.Liberal use of examples, graphics, and tables will assist you in grasping the difficult concepts. Transactional Six Sigma and Lean ServicingTM covers both theory and practical application of Lean ServicingTM, Six Sigma DMAIC and Six Sigma DFSS concepts and methods so you can implement them effectively in your service organization and achieve reduced costs and a new level of service excellence.                  2  $109.95 $87.96                      Pre-ordered           Engineering and Product Development Management: The Holistic Approach    Stephen Armstrong September 24, 2001    2  $74.00 $59.20       Engineering and Product Development Management is a practical guide to the components of engineering management, using a holistic approach. It will help engineers and managers understand what they have to do to improve the product development process by deploying new technology and new methods of working in concurrent teams. The book takes elements from six well known and understood bodies of knowledge and integrates them into a holistic approach: integrated product development, project management, process management, systems engineering, product data management, and organizational change management. These elements are framed within an overall enterprise-wide architecture. The techniques discussed in this book work for both huge multinational organizations and smaller enterprises. The emphasis throughout is on practical tools which will be invaluable for engineers, managers, and consultants responsible for project and product development.             2  $74.00 $59.20                      Pre-ordered           Kanban Made Simple: Demystifying and Applying Toyota's Legendary Manufacturing Process    John M. Gross May 13, 2003    2  $29.95 $16.17       Originally developed at Toyota, the approach to manufacturing known as Kanban has helped revolutionize how corporations and suppliers achieve maximum efficiency in getting products to and from the assembly line. When implemented properly, the Kanban technique minimizes waste, avoids overproduction, and ensures quick response to changes and problems. Kanban Made Simple is the first simple ‘how-to’ guide for incorporating the just-in-time ingenuity of the Kanban system into any manufacturing environment. From the Japanese word for “visual record,” the technique dictates that suppliers deliver parts to the warehouse only as they are needed, reducing storage in the production area. Using before-and-after case studies, this easy-to-follow guide contains information on establishing project goals, forming a Kanban team, and designing the process. Kanban Made Simple helps readers decide if Kanban is right for their organization, then teaches them how to train personnel and administer the program. A ready-to-use CD-ROM, included with the book, guides the Kanban team through the entire implementation process.             2  $29.95 $16.17                      Pre-ordered           Reducing Process Costs with Lean, Six Sigma, and Value Engineering Techniques    Kim H. Pries March 21, 2013    2  $87.95 $70.36       A company with effective cost reduction activities in place will be better positioned to adapt to shifting economic conditions. In fact, it can make the difference between organizations that thrive and those that simply survive during times of economic uncertainty. Reducing Process Costs with Lean, Six Sigma, and Value Engineering Techniques covers the methods and techniques currently available for lowering the costs of products, processes, and services.Describing why cost reductions can be just as powerful as revenue increases, the book arms readers with the understanding required to select the best solution for their company’s culture and capabilities. It emphasizes home-grown techniques that do not require the implementation of any new methodologies—making it easy to apply them in any organization.The authors explain how to reduce costs through traditional Lean methods and Lean Six Sigma. They also present Six Sigma cost savings techniques from Manufacturing Six Sigma, Services Six Sigma, and Design for Six Sigma. The book also presents optimization techniques from operations research methods, design experiment, and engineering process control.Helping you determine what your organization’s value proposition is, the text explains how to improve on the existing proposition and suggests a range of tools to help you achieve this goal. The tools and techniques presented vary in complexity and capability and most chapters include a rubric at the start to help readers determine the levels of competence required to perform the tasks outlined in that chapter.              2  $87.95 $70.36                      Pre-ordered           Find It, Book It, Grow it: A Robust Process for Account Acquisition in Electronic Manufacturing Services    Susan E. Mucha January 1, 2008    2  $69.00 $55.20       In this new book, Susan E. Mucha explores in great detail the entire account acquisition process of companies in the electronics manufacturing service (EMS) industry. EMS companies face the challenges of a 12- to 18-month sales cycle, low margins and geographically scattered customer bases. Growing the business requires a differentiation strategy and a focused process for maintaining mindshare within a diverse target market. Susan Mucha maps the process of building a differentiated brand while creating a repeatable, consistent sales process, and addresses strategies for account retention and growth.  With over 20 years' experience in the industry, Mucha has built a distinguished career consulting to EMS companies. This new book is an excellent resource for chief executive officers, vice-presidents of sales and/or marketing, sales directors, sales managers, program managers, account managers, business development managers, and sales engineers in EMS companies and in related manufacturing services industries.             2  $69.00 $55.20                      Pre-ordered           The Ultimate Improvement Cycle: Maximizing Profits through the Integration of Lean, Six Sigma, and the Theory of Constraints    Bob Sproull November 12, 2012    2  $74.95 $59.96       Recognizing the need to implement quality and eliminate waste, companies embrace Lean, Six Sigma, or a combination of the two, typically taking a broad approach that seeks to remediate every process, critical or not. When this happens, efforts become distracted, improvements indefinitely delayed, and results mediocre at best.  The Ultimate Improvement Cycle (UIC) integrates Lean, Six Sigma, and the Theory of Constraints into a combined strategy that will help you immediately focus your efforts on those areas that will make the greatest difference. The book presents basic laws of factory physics that show why the UIC delivers significant bottom-line improvement while other initiatives so often fail. It explains to you why focusing your efforts on apparent problems rather than systemic concerns is wasted effort. Focus on key areas and take improvement to the next level The Ultimate Improvement Cycle: Maximizing Profits through the Integration of Lean, Six Sigma, and the Theory of Constraints show you how to draw the best from Lean and Six Sigma by employing principles drawn from the Theory of Constraints. This approach will ensure that your effort is focused in the right place, at the right time, using the right tools, and the right amount of resources. This multi-pronged approach addresses cost accounting, variation, waste, and performance measurements. But most importantly, it focuses your organization on the right areas to optimize. Applying years of hands-on work in many environments, Bob Sproull has developed a unique proven method that capitalizes on a time-release formula for evoking the key tools that improvement requires. He shows you how to take advantage of the cyclical nature of improvement to implement change that is perpetually effective, and his approach does not require more resources than you have on hand. Although originally developed in manufacturing, the UIC works equally well in any environment whether it be manufacturing or service-oriented, including Maintenance, Repair and Overhaul (MRO) and Critical Chain Project Management (CCPM).             2  $74.95 $59.96                 More from author                 Pre-ordered           Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them    William M Feld September 28, 2000    2  $79.95 $63.96       There are some very good books available that explain the Lean Manufacturing theory and touch on implementing its techniques. However, you cannot learn "how to be" lean from merely reading the theory. And to be successful in the real-work environment you need a clear comprehension of how lean techniques work, rather than just a remote understanding of what they are. You need to know what does and does not work in different situations. And you need the benefit of practical experience in their implementation.Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them gives you the benefit of author and practitioner William Feld's 15 years of hands-on experience - and the lessons he's learned. Feld provides insight into the appropriate use of assessment, analysis, design, and, most importantly, deployment of a successful lean manufacturing program. Packed with practical advice and tips but not bogged down in theory, this book covers how, why, when, and what to do while implementing lean manufacturing. It equips you with the tools and techniques you need along with an understanding of how and why they work. Feld explores why an integrated approach is so much more beneficial in securing sustained improvement. He focuses on the interdependency of the Five Primary Elements: organization, metrics, logistics, manufacturing flow, and process control. He describes a proven, applied approach to creating a lean program using these elements. To keep up globally, and even locally, your manufacturing operation must be responsive, flexible, predictable, and consistent. You must continually improve manufacturing operations and cultivate a self directed work force driven by output based, customer performance criteria. By applying what you learn from Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them you can build a workforce - and an organization - with the capacity to satisfy world class expectations now and into the future.             2  $79.95 $63.96              Show More      ©2017 Google  Site Terms of Service  Privacy  Developers  Artists  About Google   By purchasing this item, you are transacting with Google Payments and agreeing to the Google Payments  Terms of Service  and  Privacy Notice .        subject:"Business & Economics Industries" - Google Search Please click here if you are not redirected within a few seconds...     My AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign in     Google Instant is unavailable. Press Enter to search. Learn moreGoogle Instant is off due to connection speed. Press Enter to search.Press Enter to search.Report inappropriate predictions×AllImagesNewsShoppingBooksMoreMapsVideosFlightsSettingsSearch settingsLanguagesTurn on SafeSearchAdvanced searchHistorySearch helpToolsAbout 83,900 results (0.38 seconds)   Search ResultsCutting Hill: A Chronicle of a Family Farmhttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=1891053434Alan Pistorius - 2012 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsThis is the true story of how you get your milk. And because this is the story of a family dairy farm in Vermont it is also the true story of how you get delicious, Grade A maple syrup.Cases on Strategic Information Systemshttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=1599044161Khosrow-Pour, Mehdi - 2006 - ‎Preview - ‎More editions"This book provides practitioners, educators, and students with examples of the successes and failures in the implementation of strategic information systems in organizations"--Provided by publisher.Liquid lean: developing lean culture in the process industrieshttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=1420088629Raymond C. Floyd - 2009 - ‎PreviewAll companies can benefit from Lean; this book makes sure that those who want it, know how.Analyse des Tourismusmarktes in Taiwanhttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=3640237838 - Translate this pageAntje Fydrich - 2009 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsDiplomarbeit aus dem Jahr 2006 im Fachbereich Touristik / Tourismus, Note: 1,3, Fachhochschule Worms , Veranstaltung: Internationaler Tourismus, 49 Quellen im Literaturverzeichnis, Sprache: Deutsch, Abstract: Im ersten Teil meiner ...Constructing Cultural Tourism: John Ruskin and the Tourist Gazehttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=1845411560Keith Hanley, ‎John K. Walton - 2010 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsFocusing on the formative influence of the works of John Ruskin in defining and developing cultural tourism, this book describes and assesses their effects on the tourist gaze (where to go and what to see, and how to see it) as directed at ...Handbook for Evaluating Infrastructure Regulatory Systemshttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=0821365800Ashley C. Brown, ‎Jon Stern, ‎Bernard William Tenenbaum - 2006 - ‎Full view - ‎More editionsThe fundamental premise of this book is that regulatory systems can be successfully reformed only if there are independent, objective and public evaluations of their performance.Volcano and Geothermal Tourism: Sustainable Geo-Resources for ...https://books.google.com/books?isbn=113654089XPatricia Erfurt-Cooper, ‎Malcolm Cooper - 2010 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsThis comprehensive book covers the most important issues of this growing tourism sector whilst incorporating relevant global research, making it an essential resource for all in the field. Includes colour plates.Implementing the precautionary principle: approaches from the Nordic ...https://books.google.com/books?isbn=1844073122Nicolas de Sadeleer - 2007 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsThis authoritative handbook addresses the legal aspects of how the precautionary principle is implemented in different sectors, and examines its successes, failures, strengths and weaknesses.Fundamentals of Investing in Oil and Gas: Gas Investing, oil ...https://books.google.com/books?isbn=0989043428Chris Termeer - 2013 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsThis book opens a unique and rare perspective of the Oil and Gas industry that focuses on its history and theThe Development of Mexico's Tourism Industry: Pyramids by Day, ...https://books.google.com/books?isbn=1403982864D. Berger - 2006 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsBerger argues that tourism was forged by Mexico's government in 1928 as the cornerstone of state-led modernization programmes. Berger presents tourism as the leading and influential facet of the post-revolutionary modernization programme. 12345678910Next         Help   Send feedback  Privacy Terms       subject:"Business & Economics Industries Manufacturing" - Google Search Please click here if you are not redirected within a few seconds...     My AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign in     Google Instant is unavailable. Press Enter to search. Learn moreGoogle Instant is off due to connection speed. Press Enter to search.Press Enter to search.Report inappropriate predictions×AllImagesNewsShoppingBooksMoreMapsVideosFlightsSettingsSearch settingsLanguagesTurn on SafeSearchAdvanced searchHistorySearch helpToolsAbout 2,340 results (0.42 seconds)   Search ResultsDemand Driven Performance: Operational Metrics for the 21st Centuryhttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=007179610XDebra Smith, ‎Chad Smith - 2013 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsThe authors present a demand driven blueprint and the smart metrics to maximize flow and ROI. "The methods described in this book worked in one of the most complex manufacturing operations that you can imagine with very effective results.GB/T 20799-2014: Translated English of Chinese Standard, DRM-locked. ...https://books.google.com/books?id=7VoFCgAAQBAJWayne Zheng - 2015 - ‎PreviewThis Standard specifies the terms and definitions, transportation tools, packaging, label, transport control, handling, management, documents and records related to the fresh and frozen meat.Liquid lean: developing lean culture in the process industrieshttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=1420088629Raymond C. Floyd - 2009 - ‎PreviewAll companies can benefit from Lean; this book makes sure that those who want it, know how.Metrics-Based Process Mapping: Identifying and Eliminating Waste in ...https://books.google.com/books?isbn=1439886695Karen Martin, ‎Mike Osterling - 2012 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsBuilding on the success of its popular predecessor, Metrics-Based Process Mapping: An Excel-Based Solution, this book takes readers to the next level in understanding processes and process improvement.Make or break: how manufacturers can leap from decline to revitalizationhttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=0071508309Kaj Grichnik, ‎Conrad Winkler, ‎Jeffrey Rothfeder - 2008 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsThis is the book to read before starting to reinvent your next-generation manufacturing."--THIERRY CHICHE, vice president of manufacturing, Michelin Europe "I loved the extremely wide scope of Make or Break.Engineering for Sustainabilityhttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=1466578939Dennis F.X. Mathaisel, ‎Joel M. Manary, ‎Ned H. Criscimagna - 2012 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsThis book tackles the problem from the top down, beginning with discussions on planning initiatives and implementing sustainable activities.Before Copyright: The French Book-Privilege System 1498-1526https://books.google.com/books?isbn=0521893151Elizabeth Armstrong - 2002 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsDetails the development of the privilege system, a precursor to copyright, in early sixteenth-century French publishing.Methanol Production from Natural Gas - Cost Analysis - Methanol E12A: https://books.google.com/books?id=1cGcCwAAQBAJIntratec Solutions - 2016 - ‎Full viewThis report presents a cost analysis of large-scale Methanol production from natural gas.Inside China's Automobile Factorieshttps://books.google.com/books?isbn=1107030854Lu Zhang - 2014 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsCombining original empirical data and sophisticated analysis that moves from the shop floor to national political economy and global industry dynamics, the book develops a multilayered framework for understanding how labor relations in the ...BRC Global Standard: Storage and Distribution - Issue 1https://books.google.com/books?isbn=0117036749British Retail Consortium - 2006 - ‎Preview - ‎More editionsNo public library discount on this item. 12345678910Next         Help   Send feedback  Privacy Terms       

Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version















Cellular manufacturing - Wikipedia





















 






Cellular manufacturing

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs more links to other articles to help integrate it into the encyclopedia. Please help improve this article by adding links that are relevant to the context within the existing text. (July 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Cellular manufacturing is a process of manufacturing which is a subsection of just-in-time manufacturing and lean manufacturing encompassing group technology. The goal of cellular manufacturing is to move as quickly as possible, make a wide variety of similar products, while making as little waste as possible. Cellular manufacturing involves the use of multiple "cells" in an assembly line fashion. Each of these cells is composed of one or multiple different machines which accomplish a certain task. The product moves from one cell to the next, each station completing part of the manufacturing process. Often the cells are arranged in a "U-shape" design because this allows for the overseer to move less and have the ability to more readily watch over the entire process. One of the biggest advantages of cellular manufacturing is the amount of flexibility that it has. Since most of the machines are automatic, simple changes can be made very rapidly. This allows for a variety of scaling for a product, minor changes to the overall design, and in extreme cases, entirely changing the overall design. These changes, although tedious, can be accomplished extremely quickly and precisely.[1]
A cell is created by consolidating the processes required to create a specific output, such as a part or a set of instructions. These cells allow for the reduction of extraneous steps in the process of creating the specific output, and facilitate quick identification of problems and encourage communication of employees within the cell in order to resolve issues that arise quickly. Once implemented, cellular manufacturing has been said to reliably create massive gains in productivity and quality while simultaneously reducing the amount of inventory, space and lead time required to create a product. It is for this reason that the one-piece-flow cell has been called "the ultimate in lean production."[1]



Contents


1 History
2 Cell design
3 Implementation process
4 Difficulties in creating flow
5 Benefits and costs
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading



History[edit]
Cellular manufacturing is derivative of principles of group technology, which were proposed by Flanders in 1925[2] and adopted in Russia by Mitrofanov in 1933 (whose book[3] was translated into English in 1959). Burbidge actively promoted group technology in the 1970s.[4] "Apparently, Japanese firms began implementing cellular manufacturing sometime in the 1970s," and in the 1980s cells migrated to the United States as an element of just-in-time (JIT) production.[5]
One of the first English-language books to discuss cellular manufacturing, that of Hall in 1983, referred to a cell as a “U-line,” for the common, or ideal, U-shaped configuration of a cell[6]—ideal because that shape puts all cell processes and operatives into a cluster, affording high visibility and contact. By 1990 cells had come to be treated as foundation practices in JIT manufacturing, so much so that Harmon and Peterson, in their book, Reinventing the Factory, included a section entitled, "Cell: Fundamental Factory of the Future".[7] Cellular manufacturing was carried forward in the 1990s, when just-in-time was renamed lean manufacturing.[8] Finally, when JIT/lean became widely attractive in the service sector, cellular concepts found their way into that realm; for example, Hyer and Wemmerlöv’s final chapter is devoted to office cells.[9]
Cell design[edit]
Cells are created in a workplace to facilitate flow. This is accomplished by bringing together operations (or machines, or people) involved in a processing sequence of a products natural flow and grouping them close to one another, distinct from other groups. This grouping is called a cell. These cells are used to improve many factors in a manufacturing setting by allowing one-piece flow to occur.[1][10] An example of one-piece flow would be in the production of a metallic case part that arrives at the factory from the vendor in separate pieces, requiring assembly. First, the pieces would be moved from storage to the cell, where they would be welded together, then polished, then coated, and finally packaged. All of these steps would be completed in a single cell, so as to minimize various factors (called non-value-added processes/steps) such as time required to transport materials between steps. Some common formats of single cells are: the U-shape (good for communication and quick movement of workers), the straight line, or the L-shape. The number of workers inside these formations depend on current demand and can be modulated to increase or decrease production. For example, if a cell is normally occupied by two workers and demand is doubled, four workers should be placed in the cell. Similarly, if demand halves, one worker will occupy the cell. Since cells have a variety of differing equipment, it is therefore a requirement that any employee is skilled at multiple processes.[1]




This figure from The Toyota Way shows the design of a U-shaped cell, graphing the paths of two employees through it.


While there exist many advantages to forming cells, there are some obvious benefits. It is quickly evident from observation of cells where inefficiencies lie, such as when an employee is too busy or relatively inactive. Resolving these inefficiencies can increase production and productivity by up to and above 100% in many cases. In addition to this, formation of cells consistently frees up floor space in the manufacturing/assembly environment (by having inventory only where it is absolutely required), improves safety in the work environment (due to smaller quantities of product/inventory being handled), improves morale (by imparting feelings of accomplishment and satisfaction in employees), reduces cost of inventory, and reducing inventory obsolescence.[1]
When formation of a cell would be too difficult, a simple principle is applied in order to improve efficiencies and flow, that is, to perform processes in a specific location and gather materials to that point at a rate dictated by an average of customer demand (this rate is called the takt time). This is referred to as the Pacemaker Process.[10]
Despite the advantages of designing for one-piece-flow, the formation of a cell must be carefully considered before implementation. Use of costly and complex equipment that tends to break down can cause massive delays in the production and will ruin output until they can be brought back online.[1]

"A cell is a small organizational unit...designed to exploit similarities in how you process information, make products, and serve customers. Manufacturing cells [closely locate] people and equipment required for processing families of like products. [Prior to cellularization, parts] may have traveled miles to visit all the equipment and labor needed for their fabrication... After reorganization, families of similar parts are produced together within the physical confines of cells that house most or all of the required resources,...facilitating the rapid flow and efficient processing of material and information... Furthermore, cell operators can be cross-trained in several machines, engage in job rotation, and assume responsibilities for tasks [that] previously belonged to supervisors and support staff [including] activities such as planning and scheduling, quality control, trouble-shooting, parts ordering, interfacing with customers and suppliers, and record-keeping."[11]

The short travel distances within cells serve to quicken the flows. Moreover, the compactness of a cell minimizes space that might allow build-ups of inventory between cell stations. To formalize that advantage, cells often have designed-in rules or physical devices that limit the amount of inventory between stations. Such a rule is known, in JIT/lean parlance, as kanban (from the Japanese), which establishes a maximum number of units allowable between a providing and a using work station. (Discussion and illustrations of cells in combinations with kanban are found in[12]) The simplest form, kanban squares, are marked areas on floors or tables between work stations. The rule, applied to the producing station: "If all squares are full, stop. If not, fill them up."[13]
An office cell applies the same ideas: clusters of broadly trained cell-team members that, in concert, quickly handle all of the processing for a family of services or customers.[14]
A virtual cell is a variation in which all cell resources are not brought together in a physical space. In a virtual cell, as in the standard model, team members and their equipment are dedicated to a family of products or services. Although people and equipment are physically dispersed, as in a job shop, their narrow product focus aims for and achieves quick throughput, with all its advantages, just as if the equipment were moved into a cellular cluster.[15] Lacking the visibility of physical cells, virtual cells may employ the discipline of kanban rules in order to tightly link the flows from process to process.
A simple but rather complete description of cell implementation comes from a 1985 booklet of 96 pages by Kone Corp. in Finland, producer of elevators, escalators, and the like. Excerpts follow:

"The first step involved creating cells in the assembly, electrical and chemical testing departments. In April 1984 six cells, identified by different colors, were established... All devices manufactured in cells are identified by the cell's color, and all feed-back from quality control is directed straight to the workers of the cell concerned... The second step, in summer, 1984, was to "cellularize" manufacture of the analyzer subassemblies [that are] needed in the analyzer cells, and to test them if necessary. Production of the five sub-assembly cells consists exclusively of certain analyzer sub-units. The parts and materials are located in the cells... Material control between the cells is based on the pull system and actual demand. In the analyzer cells there is a buffer consisting of two pieces for each (roughly 25 different) sub-unit. When one piece is taken into assembly, a new one is ordered from the corresponding unit-cell. The order is made [using] a magnetic [kanban] button, which identifies the ordering cell (by color), unit (by code), and order date... When the manufacturing cell has completed the order, the unit is taken with the [kanban] button to its place on the ordering cell shelf. Orders from the unit cells to the sub-cells are based on the same principle. The only difference is that the buffer size is six sub-units. This [procedure] was implemented in August, 1984."[16]

Implementation process[edit]
In order to implement cellular manufacturing, a number of steps must be performed. First, the parts to be made must be grouped by similarity (in design or manufacturing requirements) into families.[17] Then a systematic analysis of each family must be performed; typically in the form of production flow analysis (PFA) for manufacturing families, or in the examination of design/product data for design families.[17] This analysis can be time consuming and costly, but is important because a cell needs to be created for each family of parts.
There are also a number of mathematical models and algorithms to aid in planning a cellular manufacturing center, which take into account a variety of important variables such as, "multiple plant locations, multi-market allocations with production planning and various part mix."[18] Once these variables are determined with a given level of uncertainty, optimizations can be performed to minimize factors such as, "total cost of holding, inter-cell material handling, external transportation, fixed cost for producing each part in each plant, machine and labor salaries."[18]
Difficulties in creating flow[edit]
The key to creating flow is continuous improvement to production processes. Upon implementation of cellular manufacturing, management commonly "encounters strong resistance from production workers".[1] It will be beneficial to allow the change to cellular manufacturing to happen gradually.
It is also difficult to fight the desire to have some inventory on hand. It is tempting, since it would be easier to recover from an employee suddenly having to take sick leave. Unfortunately, in cellular manufacturing, it is important to remember the main tenants: "You sink or swim together as a unit" and that "Inventory hides problems and inefficiencies."[1] If the problems are not identified and subsequently resolved, the process will not improve.
Another common set of problems stems from the need to transfer materials between operations. These problems include, "exceptional elements, number of voids, machine distances, bottleneck machines and parts, machine location and relocation, part routing, cell load variation, inter and intracellular material transferring, cell reconfiguring, dynamic part demands, and operation and completion times."[19] These difficulties need to be considered and addressed to create efficient flow in cellular manufacturing.
Benefits and costs[edit]
Cellular manufacturing brings scattered processes together to form short, focused paths in concentrated physical space. So constructed, by logic a cell reduces flow time, flow distance, floor space, inventory, handling, scheduling transactions, and scrap and rework (the latter because of quick discovery of nonconformities). Moreover, cells lead to simplified, higher validity costing, since the costs of producing items are contained within the cell rather scattered in distance and the passage of reporting time.[20][21]
Cellular manufacturing facilitates both production and quality control.[17] Cells that are underperforming in either volume or quality can be easily isolated and targeted for improvement. The segmentation of the production process allows problems to be easily located and it is more clear which parts are affected by the problem.
There are also a number of benefits for employees working in cellular manufacturing. The small cell structure improves group cohesiveness and scales the manufacturing process down to a more manageable level for the workers.[17] Workers can more easily see problems or possible improvements within their own cells and tend to be more self-motivated to propose changes.[17] Additionally, these improvements that are instigated by the workers themselves cause less and less need for management, so over time overhead costs can be reduced.[17] Furthermore, the workers often are able to rotate between tasks within their cell, which offers variety in their work. This can further increase efficiency because work monotony has been linked to absenteeism and reduced production quality.[18]
Case studies in just-in-time and lean manufacturing are replete with impressive quantitative measures along those lines. For example, BAE Systems, Platform Solutions (Fort Wayne, Ind.), producing aircraft engine monitors and controls, implemented cells for 80 percent of production, reducing customer lead time 90 percent, work-in-process inventory 70 percent, space for one product family from 6,000 square feet to 1,200 square feet, while increasing product reliability 300 percent, multi-skilling the union-shop work force, and being designated an Industry Week Best Plant for the year 2000.[22] By five years later, rework and scrap had been cut 50 percent, new product introduction cycles 60 percent, and transactions 90 percent, while also increasing inventory turns three-fold and service turn times 30 percent, and being awarded a Shingo Prize for the year 2005.[23]
It appears to be difficult to isolate how much of those benefits accrue from cellular organization itself; among many case studies researched for this article few include attempts at isolating the benefits. One exception is the contention, at Steward, Inc. (Chattanooga, Tenn.), producing nickel zinc ferrite parts for electromagnetic interference suppression. According to case study authors, cells resulted in reductions of cycle time from 14 to 2 days, work-in-process inventories by 80 percent, finished inventories by 60 percent, lateness by 96 percent, and space by 56 percent.[24]
Another cellular case study includes quantitative estimates of the extent to which cells contributed to overall benefits. At Hughes Ground Systems Group (Fullerton, Calif.), producing circuit cards for defense equipment, the first cell, which began as a pilot project with 15 volunteers, was launched in 1987. One month later a second cell began, and by 1992 all production employees, numbering about 150, had been integrated into seven cells. Prior to cells, circuit card cycle time, from kit release to shipment to the customer, had been 38 weeks. After the cells had taken over the full production sequence (mechanical assembly, wave solder, thermal cycle, and conformal coat), cycle time had fallen to 30.5 weeks, of which production manager John Reiss attributed 20 weeks to use of a "WIP chart system" by the cell teams and the other 10.5 weeks to the cellular organization itself. Later, when it seemed that the cells were overly large and cumbersome, cell sizes were shrunk by two-thirds, resulting in “micro cells” that cut cycle time by another 1.5 weeks. Finally, by adopting certain other improvements, cycle times had decreased to four weeks. Other improvements included reducing work-in-process inventory from 6 or 7 days to one day and percent defective from 0.04 to 0.01[25] Switching from a functional (job-shop) layout to cells often costs has a minus net cost, inasmuch as the cell reduces costs of transport, work-in-process and finished inventory, transactions, and rework.[26] When large, heavy, expensive pieces of equipment (sometimes called “monuments” in lean lingo) must be moved, however, the initial costs can be high to the point where cells are not feasible.[27]
There are a number of possible limitations to implementing cellular manufacturing. Some argue that cellular manufacturing can lead to a decrease in production flexibility.[17] Cells are typically designed to maintain a specific flow volume of parts being produced. Should the demand or necessary quantity decrease, the cells may have to be realigned to match the new requirements, which is a costly operation, and one not typically required in other manufacturing setups.[17]
See also[edit]

Cross-training (business)
World class manufacturing

References[edit]



^ a b c d e f g h Liker, Jeffery (2004). The Toyota Way. New York: McGraw Hill. pp. 31, 96–101. 
^ 5. Flanders, R.E. 1925. Design, manufacture, and production control of a standard machine. Transactions of ASME, Vol. 26, 691-738.
^ 6. Mitrofanov, S.P. 1959. The scientific principles of group technology. Leningrad (trans. By J.L. Grayson, Birmingham University).
^ 4. Burbidge, J.L. 1975. The Introduction to Group Technology. New York: John Wiley.
^ Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 20
^ 7. Hall, Robert W. 1983. Zero Inventories. Homewood, Ill., Dow Jones-Irwin. pp 120-126
^ 8. Harmon, R.L., and L.D. Peterson. 1990. Reinventing the Factory: Productivity Breakthroughs in Manufacturing Today. New York: Free Press. pp 118-123
^ 2. Black, J. T., and Steve L. Hunter. 2003. op. cit.
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 573-617
^ a b Morgan, J.M. (2006). The Toyota Product Development System. New York: Productivity Press. p. 97. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 4
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 332-338
^ 3. Hall, Robert W. 1987. op. cit., p 92
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., p 5
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 27, 136, 585-586
^ "JIT-Production." Hyvinkaa, Finland: Kone Corporation/ATF
^ a b c d e f g h Inman, R. Anthony; Helm, Marilyn (2006). Encyclopedia of Management. Detroit, MI: Gale Cengage Learning. pp. 72–78. ISBN 978-0-7876-6556-2. 
^ a b c Aalaei, Amin; Davoudpour, Hamid. "A robust optimization model for cellular manufacturing system into supply chain management". International Journal of Production Economics. doi:10.1016/j.ijpe.2016.01.014. 
^ Delgoshaei, Aidin; Ariffin, Mohd Khairol Anuar Mohd; Leman, Zulkiflle; Baharudin, B. T. Hang Tuah Bin; Gomes, Chandima (2016-01-12). "Review of evolution of cellular manufacturing system’s approaches: Material transferring models". International Journal of Precision Engineering and Manufacturing. 17 (1): 131–149. ISSN 2234-7593. doi:10.1007/s12541-016-0017-9. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. Chapter 10: Cost Accounting and Cellular Manufacturing, pp 281-310)
^ Frecka, Thomas J. Accounting for Manufacturing Productivity: A Set of Papers from an AME Meeting--Problems and Directions in Cost Accounting. Association for Manufacturing Excellence, 2nd Printing. Several of the 11 articles in this report pertain to changes in cost accounting stemming from JIT production, and cells in particular.
^ 9. Sheridan, John L. 2000. “Lean Sigma synergy,” Industry Week (October 16) pp 81-82.
^ 10. 2005 Shingo Prize website.
^ 11. Levasseur, Gerls A., Marilyn M. Helms, and Aleisha A. Zink. 1995. “A Conversion from a functional to a cellular manufacturing layout at Steward, Inc. Production and Inventory Management. 3rd quarter, pp 37-42.
^ Tonkin, Lea A.P. 1992. Hughes Ground Systems Group Takes Aim at Defects, Delays. Target (May–June). pp 25-27
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 225-232
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op cit., pp 519-521



Further reading[edit]

Anbumalar, V.; Raja Chandra Sekar, M (December 2015). "METHODS FOR SOLVING CELL FORMATION, STATIC LAYOUT AND DYNAMIC LAYOUT CELLULAR MANUFACTURING SYSTEM PROBLEMS: A REVIEW" (PDF). Asian Journal of Science and Technology.
Black, J. T. (1991). The Design of the Factory with a Future, New York, NY: McGraw-Hill, Inc., 1991.
Black, J. T. (2000). 'Lean Manufacturing Implementation', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 177-86.
Burbidge, J.L. (1978), The Principles of Production Control, MacDonald and Evans, England, ISBN 0-7121-1676-1.
Brandon, John. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing: Integrating Technology and Management, Somerset, England: Research Studies Press LTD.
Feld, William M., (2001). Lean Manufacturing: tools, techniques, and how to use them, Boca Raton, FL; Alexandria, VA: St. Lucie Press; Apics.
Hyer, N.; Brown, K.A. 2003. Work cells with staying power: lessons for process-complete operations. California Management Review 46/1 (Fall): 37-52.
Houshyar, A. Nouri; Leman, Z; Pakzad Moghadam, H; Sulaiman, R (August 2014). "Review on Cellular Manufacturing System and its Components". International Journal of Engineering and Advanced Technology (IJEAT).
İşlier, Attila (2015-01-01). "Cellular Manufacturing Systems: Organization, Trends And Innovative Methods". Alphanumeric Journal 3 (2). ISSN 2148-2225
Irani, Shahrukh. (1999). Handbook of Cellular Manufacturing Systems, New York, NY: John Wiley & Sons, Inc., 1999.
Kannan, V.R. 1996. A virtual cellular manufacturing approach to batch production. Decision Sciences. 27 (3), 519-539.
McLean, C.R., H.M. Bloom, and T.H. Hopp. 1982. The virtual manufacturing cell. Proceedings of the Fourth IFAC/IFIP Conference on Information Control Problems in Manufacturing Technology. Gaithersburg, Md. (October).
Singh, Nanua and Divakar Rajamani. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing Systems Design, Planning and Control, London, UK: Chapman & Hall.
Schonberger, R.J. 2004. Make work cells work for you. Quality Progress 3/74 (April 2004): 58-63.
Swamdimass, Paul M. and Darlow, Neil R. (2000). 'Manufacturing Strategy', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 17-24.







v
t
e


Lean manufacturing tools






Cellular manufacturing
Takt time
Standardized work
Continuous-flow manufacturing
Kanban
5 Whys
Single-Minute Exchange of Die
Poka-yoke
Production leveling
Total productive maintenance
5S (methodology)
PDCA









Authority control



NDL: 01007879










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Cellular_manufacturing&oldid=783215872"					
Categories: Lean manufacturingProcess managementManufacturingProduction and manufacturingCommercial item transport and distributionManagementInventoryHidden categories: Articles with too few wikilinks from July 2015All articles with too few wikilinksArticles covered by WikiProject Wikify from July 2015All articles covered by WikiProject Wikify 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolNederlands日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 31 May 2017, at 21:12.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Cellular manufacturing - Wikipedia





















 






Cellular manufacturing

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs more links to other articles to help integrate it into the encyclopedia. Please help improve this article by adding links that are relevant to the context within the existing text. (July 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Cellular manufacturing is a process of manufacturing which is a subsection of just-in-time manufacturing and lean manufacturing encompassing group technology. The goal of cellular manufacturing is to move as quickly as possible, make a wide variety of similar products, while making as little waste as possible. Cellular manufacturing involves the use of multiple "cells" in an assembly line fashion. Each of these cells is composed of one or multiple different machines which accomplish a certain task. The product moves from one cell to the next, each station completing part of the manufacturing process. Often the cells are arranged in a "U-shape" design because this allows for the overseer to move less and have the ability to more readily watch over the entire process. One of the biggest advantages of cellular manufacturing is the amount of flexibility that it has. Since most of the machines are automatic, simple changes can be made very rapidly. This allows for a variety of scaling for a product, minor changes to the overall design, and in extreme cases, entirely changing the overall design. These changes, although tedious, can be accomplished extremely quickly and precisely.[1]
A cell is created by consolidating the processes required to create a specific output, such as a part or a set of instructions. These cells allow for the reduction of extraneous steps in the process of creating the specific output, and facilitate quick identification of problems and encourage communication of employees within the cell in order to resolve issues that arise quickly. Once implemented, cellular manufacturing has been said to reliably create massive gains in productivity and quality while simultaneously reducing the amount of inventory, space and lead time required to create a product. It is for this reason that the one-piece-flow cell has been called "the ultimate in lean production."[1]



Contents


1 History
2 Cell design
3 Implementation process
4 Difficulties in creating flow
5 Benefits and costs
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading



History[edit]
Cellular manufacturing is derivative of principles of group technology, which were proposed by Flanders in 1925[2] and adopted in Russia by Mitrofanov in 1933 (whose book[3] was translated into English in 1959). Burbidge actively promoted group technology in the 1970s.[4] "Apparently, Japanese firms began implementing cellular manufacturing sometime in the 1970s," and in the 1980s cells migrated to the United States as an element of just-in-time (JIT) production.[5]
One of the first English-language books to discuss cellular manufacturing, that of Hall in 1983, referred to a cell as a “U-line,” for the common, or ideal, U-shaped configuration of a cell[6]—ideal because that shape puts all cell processes and operatives into a cluster, affording high visibility and contact. By 1990 cells had come to be treated as foundation practices in JIT manufacturing, so much so that Harmon and Peterson, in their book, Reinventing the Factory, included a section entitled, "Cell: Fundamental Factory of the Future".[7] Cellular manufacturing was carried forward in the 1990s, when just-in-time was renamed lean manufacturing.[8] Finally, when JIT/lean became widely attractive in the service sector, cellular concepts found their way into that realm; for example, Hyer and Wemmerlöv’s final chapter is devoted to office cells.[9]
Cell design[edit]
Cells are created in a workplace to facilitate flow. This is accomplished by bringing together operations (or machines, or people) involved in a processing sequence of a products natural flow and grouping them close to one another, distinct from other groups. This grouping is called a cell. These cells are used to improve many factors in a manufacturing setting by allowing one-piece flow to occur.[1][10] An example of one-piece flow would be in the production of a metallic case part that arrives at the factory from the vendor in separate pieces, requiring assembly. First, the pieces would be moved from storage to the cell, where they would be welded together, then polished, then coated, and finally packaged. All of these steps would be completed in a single cell, so as to minimize various factors (called non-value-added processes/steps) such as time required to transport materials between steps. Some common formats of single cells are: the U-shape (good for communication and quick movement of workers), the straight line, or the L-shape. The number of workers inside these formations depend on current demand and can be modulated to increase or decrease production. For example, if a cell is normally occupied by two workers and demand is doubled, four workers should be placed in the cell. Similarly, if demand halves, one worker will occupy the cell. Since cells have a variety of differing equipment, it is therefore a requirement that any employee is skilled at multiple processes.[1]




This figure from The Toyota Way shows the design of a U-shaped cell, graphing the paths of two employees through it.


While there exist many advantages to forming cells, there are some obvious benefits. It is quickly evident from observation of cells where inefficiencies lie, such as when an employee is too busy or relatively inactive. Resolving these inefficiencies can increase production and productivity by up to and above 100% in many cases. In addition to this, formation of cells consistently frees up floor space in the manufacturing/assembly environment (by having inventory only where it is absolutely required), improves safety in the work environment (due to smaller quantities of product/inventory being handled), improves morale (by imparting feelings of accomplishment and satisfaction in employees), reduces cost of inventory, and reducing inventory obsolescence.[1]
When formation of a cell would be too difficult, a simple principle is applied in order to improve efficiencies and flow, that is, to perform processes in a specific location and gather materials to that point at a rate dictated by an average of customer demand (this rate is called the takt time). This is referred to as the Pacemaker Process.[10]
Despite the advantages of designing for one-piece-flow, the formation of a cell must be carefully considered before implementation. Use of costly and complex equipment that tends to break down can cause massive delays in the production and will ruin output until they can be brought back online.[1]

"A cell is a small organizational unit...designed to exploit similarities in how you process information, make products, and serve customers. Manufacturing cells [closely locate] people and equipment required for processing families of like products. [Prior to cellularization, parts] may have traveled miles to visit all the equipment and labor needed for their fabrication... After reorganization, families of similar parts are produced together within the physical confines of cells that house most or all of the required resources,...facilitating the rapid flow and efficient processing of material and information... Furthermore, cell operators can be cross-trained in several machines, engage in job rotation, and assume responsibilities for tasks [that] previously belonged to supervisors and support staff [including] activities such as planning and scheduling, quality control, trouble-shooting, parts ordering, interfacing with customers and suppliers, and record-keeping."[11]

The short travel distances within cells serve to quicken the flows. Moreover, the compactness of a cell minimizes space that might allow build-ups of inventory between cell stations. To formalize that advantage, cells often have designed-in rules or physical devices that limit the amount of inventory between stations. Such a rule is known, in JIT/lean parlance, as kanban (from the Japanese), which establishes a maximum number of units allowable between a providing and a using work station. (Discussion and illustrations of cells in combinations with kanban are found in[12]) The simplest form, kanban squares, are marked areas on floors or tables between work stations. The rule, applied to the producing station: "If all squares are full, stop. If not, fill them up."[13]
An office cell applies the same ideas: clusters of broadly trained cell-team members that, in concert, quickly handle all of the processing for a family of services or customers.[14]
A virtual cell is a variation in which all cell resources are not brought together in a physical space. In a virtual cell, as in the standard model, team members and their equipment are dedicated to a family of products or services. Although people and equipment are physically dispersed, as in a job shop, their narrow product focus aims for and achieves quick throughput, with all its advantages, just as if the equipment were moved into a cellular cluster.[15] Lacking the visibility of physical cells, virtual cells may employ the discipline of kanban rules in order to tightly link the flows from process to process.
A simple but rather complete description of cell implementation comes from a 1985 booklet of 96 pages by Kone Corp. in Finland, producer of elevators, escalators, and the like. Excerpts follow:

"The first step involved creating cells in the assembly, electrical and chemical testing departments. In April 1984 six cells, identified by different colors, were established... All devices manufactured in cells are identified by the cell's color, and all feed-back from quality control is directed straight to the workers of the cell concerned... The second step, in summer, 1984, was to "cellularize" manufacture of the analyzer subassemblies [that are] needed in the analyzer cells, and to test them if necessary. Production of the five sub-assembly cells consists exclusively of certain analyzer sub-units. The parts and materials are located in the cells... Material control between the cells is based on the pull system and actual demand. In the analyzer cells there is a buffer consisting of two pieces for each (roughly 25 different) sub-unit. When one piece is taken into assembly, a new one is ordered from the corresponding unit-cell. The order is made [using] a magnetic [kanban] button, which identifies the ordering cell (by color), unit (by code), and order date... When the manufacturing cell has completed the order, the unit is taken with the [kanban] button to its place on the ordering cell shelf. Orders from the unit cells to the sub-cells are based on the same principle. The only difference is that the buffer size is six sub-units. This [procedure] was implemented in August, 1984."[16]

Implementation process[edit]
In order to implement cellular manufacturing, a number of steps must be performed. First, the parts to be made must be grouped by similarity (in design or manufacturing requirements) into families.[17] Then a systematic analysis of each family must be performed; typically in the form of production flow analysis (PFA) for manufacturing families, or in the examination of design/product data for design families.[17] This analysis can be time consuming and costly, but is important because a cell needs to be created for each family of parts.
There are also a number of mathematical models and algorithms to aid in planning a cellular manufacturing center, which take into account a variety of important variables such as, "multiple plant locations, multi-market allocations with production planning and various part mix."[18] Once these variables are determined with a given level of uncertainty, optimizations can be performed to minimize factors such as, "total cost of holding, inter-cell material handling, external transportation, fixed cost for producing each part in each plant, machine and labor salaries."[18]
Difficulties in creating flow[edit]
The key to creating flow is continuous improvement to production processes. Upon implementation of cellular manufacturing, management commonly "encounters strong resistance from production workers".[1] It will be beneficial to allow the change to cellular manufacturing to happen gradually.
It is also difficult to fight the desire to have some inventory on hand. It is tempting, since it would be easier to recover from an employee suddenly having to take sick leave. Unfortunately, in cellular manufacturing, it is important to remember the main tenants: "You sink or swim together as a unit" and that "Inventory hides problems and inefficiencies."[1] If the problems are not identified and subsequently resolved, the process will not improve.
Another common set of problems stems from the need to transfer materials between operations. These problems include, "exceptional elements, number of voids, machine distances, bottleneck machines and parts, machine location and relocation, part routing, cell load variation, inter and intracellular material transferring, cell reconfiguring, dynamic part demands, and operation and completion times."[19] These difficulties need to be considered and addressed to create efficient flow in cellular manufacturing.
Benefits and costs[edit]
Cellular manufacturing brings scattered processes together to form short, focused paths in concentrated physical space. So constructed, by logic a cell reduces flow time, flow distance, floor space, inventory, handling, scheduling transactions, and scrap and rework (the latter because of quick discovery of nonconformities). Moreover, cells lead to simplified, higher validity costing, since the costs of producing items are contained within the cell rather scattered in distance and the passage of reporting time.[20][21]
Cellular manufacturing facilitates both production and quality control.[17] Cells that are underperforming in either volume or quality can be easily isolated and targeted for improvement. The segmentation of the production process allows problems to be easily located and it is more clear which parts are affected by the problem.
There are also a number of benefits for employees working in cellular manufacturing. The small cell structure improves group cohesiveness and scales the manufacturing process down to a more manageable level for the workers.[17] Workers can more easily see problems or possible improvements within their own cells and tend to be more self-motivated to propose changes.[17] Additionally, these improvements that are instigated by the workers themselves cause less and less need for management, so over time overhead costs can be reduced.[17] Furthermore, the workers often are able to rotate between tasks within their cell, which offers variety in their work. This can further increase efficiency because work monotony has been linked to absenteeism and reduced production quality.[18]
Case studies in just-in-time and lean manufacturing are replete with impressive quantitative measures along those lines. For example, BAE Systems, Platform Solutions (Fort Wayne, Ind.), producing aircraft engine monitors and controls, implemented cells for 80 percent of production, reducing customer lead time 90 percent, work-in-process inventory 70 percent, space for one product family from 6,000 square feet to 1,200 square feet, while increasing product reliability 300 percent, multi-skilling the union-shop work force, and being designated an Industry Week Best Plant for the year 2000.[22] By five years later, rework and scrap had been cut 50 percent, new product introduction cycles 60 percent, and transactions 90 percent, while also increasing inventory turns three-fold and service turn times 30 percent, and being awarded a Shingo Prize for the year 2005.[23]
It appears to be difficult to isolate how much of those benefits accrue from cellular organization itself; among many case studies researched for this article few include attempts at isolating the benefits. One exception is the contention, at Steward, Inc. (Chattanooga, Tenn.), producing nickel zinc ferrite parts for electromagnetic interference suppression. According to case study authors, cells resulted in reductions of cycle time from 14 to 2 days, work-in-process inventories by 80 percent, finished inventories by 60 percent, lateness by 96 percent, and space by 56 percent.[24]
Another cellular case study includes quantitative estimates of the extent to which cells contributed to overall benefits. At Hughes Ground Systems Group (Fullerton, Calif.), producing circuit cards for defense equipment, the first cell, which began as a pilot project with 15 volunteers, was launched in 1987. One month later a second cell began, and by 1992 all production employees, numbering about 150, had been integrated into seven cells. Prior to cells, circuit card cycle time, from kit release to shipment to the customer, had been 38 weeks. After the cells had taken over the full production sequence (mechanical assembly, wave solder, thermal cycle, and conformal coat), cycle time had fallen to 30.5 weeks, of which production manager John Reiss attributed 20 weeks to use of a "WIP chart system" by the cell teams and the other 10.5 weeks to the cellular organization itself. Later, when it seemed that the cells were overly large and cumbersome, cell sizes were shrunk by two-thirds, resulting in “micro cells” that cut cycle time by another 1.5 weeks. Finally, by adopting certain other improvements, cycle times had decreased to four weeks. Other improvements included reducing work-in-process inventory from 6 or 7 days to one day and percent defective from 0.04 to 0.01[25] Switching from a functional (job-shop) layout to cells often costs has a minus net cost, inasmuch as the cell reduces costs of transport, work-in-process and finished inventory, transactions, and rework.[26] When large, heavy, expensive pieces of equipment (sometimes called “monuments” in lean lingo) must be moved, however, the initial costs can be high to the point where cells are not feasible.[27]
There are a number of possible limitations to implementing cellular manufacturing. Some argue that cellular manufacturing can lead to a decrease in production flexibility.[17] Cells are typically designed to maintain a specific flow volume of parts being produced. Should the demand or necessary quantity decrease, the cells may have to be realigned to match the new requirements, which is a costly operation, and one not typically required in other manufacturing setups.[17]
See also[edit]

Cross-training (business)
World class manufacturing

References[edit]



^ a b c d e f g h Liker, Jeffery (2004). The Toyota Way. New York: McGraw Hill. pp. 31, 96–101. 
^ 5. Flanders, R.E. 1925. Design, manufacture, and production control of a standard machine. Transactions of ASME, Vol. 26, 691-738.
^ 6. Mitrofanov, S.P. 1959. The scientific principles of group technology. Leningrad (trans. By J.L. Grayson, Birmingham University).
^ 4. Burbidge, J.L. 1975. The Introduction to Group Technology. New York: John Wiley.
^ Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 20
^ 7. Hall, Robert W. 1983. Zero Inventories. Homewood, Ill., Dow Jones-Irwin. pp 120-126
^ 8. Harmon, R.L., and L.D. Peterson. 1990. Reinventing the Factory: Productivity Breakthroughs in Manufacturing Today. New York: Free Press. pp 118-123
^ 2. Black, J. T., and Steve L. Hunter. 2003. op. cit.
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 573-617
^ a b Morgan, J.M. (2006). The Toyota Product Development System. New York: Productivity Press. p. 97. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 4
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 332-338
^ 3. Hall, Robert W. 1987. op. cit., p 92
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., p 5
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 27, 136, 585-586
^ "JIT-Production." Hyvinkaa, Finland: Kone Corporation/ATF
^ a b c d e f g h Inman, R. Anthony; Helm, Marilyn (2006). Encyclopedia of Management. Detroit, MI: Gale Cengage Learning. pp. 72–78. ISBN 978-0-7876-6556-2. 
^ a b c Aalaei, Amin; Davoudpour, Hamid. "A robust optimization model for cellular manufacturing system into supply chain management". International Journal of Production Economics. doi:10.1016/j.ijpe.2016.01.014. 
^ Delgoshaei, Aidin; Ariffin, Mohd Khairol Anuar Mohd; Leman, Zulkiflle; Baharudin, B. T. Hang Tuah Bin; Gomes, Chandima (2016-01-12). "Review of evolution of cellular manufacturing system’s approaches: Material transferring models". International Journal of Precision Engineering and Manufacturing. 17 (1): 131–149. ISSN 2234-7593. doi:10.1007/s12541-016-0017-9. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. Chapter 10: Cost Accounting and Cellular Manufacturing, pp 281-310)
^ Frecka, Thomas J. Accounting for Manufacturing Productivity: A Set of Papers from an AME Meeting--Problems and Directions in Cost Accounting. Association for Manufacturing Excellence, 2nd Printing. Several of the 11 articles in this report pertain to changes in cost accounting stemming from JIT production, and cells in particular.
^ 9. Sheridan, John L. 2000. “Lean Sigma synergy,” Industry Week (October 16) pp 81-82.
^ 10. 2005 Shingo Prize website.
^ 11. Levasseur, Gerls A., Marilyn M. Helms, and Aleisha A. Zink. 1995. “A Conversion from a functional to a cellular manufacturing layout at Steward, Inc. Production and Inventory Management. 3rd quarter, pp 37-42.
^ Tonkin, Lea A.P. 1992. Hughes Ground Systems Group Takes Aim at Defects, Delays. Target (May–June). pp 25-27
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 225-232
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op cit., pp 519-521



Further reading[edit]

Anbumalar, V.; Raja Chandra Sekar, M (December 2015). "METHODS FOR SOLVING CELL FORMATION, STATIC LAYOUT AND DYNAMIC LAYOUT CELLULAR MANUFACTURING SYSTEM PROBLEMS: A REVIEW" (PDF). Asian Journal of Science and Technology.
Black, J. T. (1991). The Design of the Factory with a Future, New York, NY: McGraw-Hill, Inc., 1991.
Black, J. T. (2000). 'Lean Manufacturing Implementation', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 177-86.
Burbidge, J.L. (1978), The Principles of Production Control, MacDonald and Evans, England, ISBN 0-7121-1676-1.
Brandon, John. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing: Integrating Technology and Management, Somerset, England: Research Studies Press LTD.
Feld, William M., (2001). Lean Manufacturing: tools, techniques, and how to use them, Boca Raton, FL; Alexandria, VA: St. Lucie Press; Apics.
Hyer, N.; Brown, K.A. 2003. Work cells with staying power: lessons for process-complete operations. California Management Review 46/1 (Fall): 37-52.
Houshyar, A. Nouri; Leman, Z; Pakzad Moghadam, H; Sulaiman, R (August 2014). "Review on Cellular Manufacturing System and its Components". International Journal of Engineering and Advanced Technology (IJEAT).
İşlier, Attila (2015-01-01). "Cellular Manufacturing Systems: Organization, Trends And Innovative Methods". Alphanumeric Journal 3 (2). ISSN 2148-2225
Irani, Shahrukh. (1999). Handbook of Cellular Manufacturing Systems, New York, NY: John Wiley & Sons, Inc., 1999.
Kannan, V.R. 1996. A virtual cellular manufacturing approach to batch production. Decision Sciences. 27 (3), 519-539.
McLean, C.R., H.M. Bloom, and T.H. Hopp. 1982. The virtual manufacturing cell. Proceedings of the Fourth IFAC/IFIP Conference on Information Control Problems in Manufacturing Technology. Gaithersburg, Md. (October).
Singh, Nanua and Divakar Rajamani. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing Systems Design, Planning and Control, London, UK: Chapman & Hall.
Schonberger, R.J. 2004. Make work cells work for you. Quality Progress 3/74 (April 2004): 58-63.
Swamdimass, Paul M. and Darlow, Neil R. (2000). 'Manufacturing Strategy', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 17-24.







v
t
e


Lean manufacturing tools






Cellular manufacturing
Takt time
Standardized work
Continuous-flow manufacturing
Kanban
5 Whys
Single-Minute Exchange of Die
Poka-yoke
Production leveling
Total productive maintenance
5S (methodology)
PDCA









Authority control



NDL: 01007879










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Cellular_manufacturing&oldid=783215872"					
Categories: Lean manufacturingProcess managementManufacturingProduction and manufacturingCommercial item transport and distributionManagementInventoryHidden categories: Articles with too few wikilinks from July 2015All articles with too few wikilinksArticles covered by WikiProject Wikify from July 2015All articles covered by WikiProject Wikify 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolNederlands日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 31 May 2017, at 21:12.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Cellular manufacturing - Wikipedia





















 






Cellular manufacturing

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs more links to other articles to help integrate it into the encyclopedia. Please help improve this article by adding links that are relevant to the context within the existing text. (July 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Cellular manufacturing is a process of manufacturing which is a subsection of just-in-time manufacturing and lean manufacturing encompassing group technology. The goal of cellular manufacturing is to move as quickly as possible, make a wide variety of similar products, while making as little waste as possible. Cellular manufacturing involves the use of multiple "cells" in an assembly line fashion. Each of these cells is composed of one or multiple different machines which accomplish a certain task. The product moves from one cell to the next, each station completing part of the manufacturing process. Often the cells are arranged in a "U-shape" design because this allows for the overseer to move less and have the ability to more readily watch over the entire process. One of the biggest advantages of cellular manufacturing is the amount of flexibility that it has. Since most of the machines are automatic, simple changes can be made very rapidly. This allows for a variety of scaling for a product, minor changes to the overall design, and in extreme cases, entirely changing the overall design. These changes, although tedious, can be accomplished extremely quickly and precisely.[1]
A cell is created by consolidating the processes required to create a specific output, such as a part or a set of instructions. These cells allow for the reduction of extraneous steps in the process of creating the specific output, and facilitate quick identification of problems and encourage communication of employees within the cell in order to resolve issues that arise quickly. Once implemented, cellular manufacturing has been said to reliably create massive gains in productivity and quality while simultaneously reducing the amount of inventory, space and lead time required to create a product. It is for this reason that the one-piece-flow cell has been called "the ultimate in lean production."[1]



Contents


1 History
2 Cell design
3 Implementation process
4 Difficulties in creating flow
5 Benefits and costs
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading



History[edit]
Cellular manufacturing is derivative of principles of group technology, which were proposed by Flanders in 1925[2] and adopted in Russia by Mitrofanov in 1933 (whose book[3] was translated into English in 1959). Burbidge actively promoted group technology in the 1970s.[4] "Apparently, Japanese firms began implementing cellular manufacturing sometime in the 1970s," and in the 1980s cells migrated to the United States as an element of just-in-time (JIT) production.[5]
One of the first English-language books to discuss cellular manufacturing, that of Hall in 1983, referred to a cell as a “U-line,” for the common, or ideal, U-shaped configuration of a cell[6]—ideal because that shape puts all cell processes and operatives into a cluster, affording high visibility and contact. By 1990 cells had come to be treated as foundation practices in JIT manufacturing, so much so that Harmon and Peterson, in their book, Reinventing the Factory, included a section entitled, "Cell: Fundamental Factory of the Future".[7] Cellular manufacturing was carried forward in the 1990s, when just-in-time was renamed lean manufacturing.[8] Finally, when JIT/lean became widely attractive in the service sector, cellular concepts found their way into that realm; for example, Hyer and Wemmerlöv’s final chapter is devoted to office cells.[9]
Cell design[edit]
Cells are created in a workplace to facilitate flow. This is accomplished by bringing together operations (or machines, or people) involved in a processing sequence of a products natural flow and grouping them close to one another, distinct from other groups. This grouping is called a cell. These cells are used to improve many factors in a manufacturing setting by allowing one-piece flow to occur.[1][10] An example of one-piece flow would be in the production of a metallic case part that arrives at the factory from the vendor in separate pieces, requiring assembly. First, the pieces would be moved from storage to the cell, where they would be welded together, then polished, then coated, and finally packaged. All of these steps would be completed in a single cell, so as to minimize various factors (called non-value-added processes/steps) such as time required to transport materials between steps. Some common formats of single cells are: the U-shape (good for communication and quick movement of workers), the straight line, or the L-shape. The number of workers inside these formations depend on current demand and can be modulated to increase or decrease production. For example, if a cell is normally occupied by two workers and demand is doubled, four workers should be placed in the cell. Similarly, if demand halves, one worker will occupy the cell. Since cells have a variety of differing equipment, it is therefore a requirement that any employee is skilled at multiple processes.[1]




This figure from The Toyota Way shows the design of a U-shaped cell, graphing the paths of two employees through it.


While there exist many advantages to forming cells, there are some obvious benefits. It is quickly evident from observation of cells where inefficiencies lie, such as when an employee is too busy or relatively inactive. Resolving these inefficiencies can increase production and productivity by up to and above 100% in many cases. In addition to this, formation of cells consistently frees up floor space in the manufacturing/assembly environment (by having inventory only where it is absolutely required), improves safety in the work environment (due to smaller quantities of product/inventory being handled), improves morale (by imparting feelings of accomplishment and satisfaction in employees), reduces cost of inventory, and reducing inventory obsolescence.[1]
When formation of a cell would be too difficult, a simple principle is applied in order to improve efficiencies and flow, that is, to perform processes in a specific location and gather materials to that point at a rate dictated by an average of customer demand (this rate is called the takt time). This is referred to as the Pacemaker Process.[10]
Despite the advantages of designing for one-piece-flow, the formation of a cell must be carefully considered before implementation. Use of costly and complex equipment that tends to break down can cause massive delays in the production and will ruin output until they can be brought back online.[1]

"A cell is a small organizational unit...designed to exploit similarities in how you process information, make products, and serve customers. Manufacturing cells [closely locate] people and equipment required for processing families of like products. [Prior to cellularization, parts] may have traveled miles to visit all the equipment and labor needed for their fabrication... After reorganization, families of similar parts are produced together within the physical confines of cells that house most or all of the required resources,...facilitating the rapid flow and efficient processing of material and information... Furthermore, cell operators can be cross-trained in several machines, engage in job rotation, and assume responsibilities for tasks [that] previously belonged to supervisors and support staff [including] activities such as planning and scheduling, quality control, trouble-shooting, parts ordering, interfacing with customers and suppliers, and record-keeping."[11]

The short travel distances within cells serve to quicken the flows. Moreover, the compactness of a cell minimizes space that might allow build-ups of inventory between cell stations. To formalize that advantage, cells often have designed-in rules or physical devices that limit the amount of inventory between stations. Such a rule is known, in JIT/lean parlance, as kanban (from the Japanese), which establishes a maximum number of units allowable between a providing and a using work station. (Discussion and illustrations of cells in combinations with kanban are found in[12]) The simplest form, kanban squares, are marked areas on floors or tables between work stations. The rule, applied to the producing station: "If all squares are full, stop. If not, fill them up."[13]
An office cell applies the same ideas: clusters of broadly trained cell-team members that, in concert, quickly handle all of the processing for a family of services or customers.[14]
A virtual cell is a variation in which all cell resources are not brought together in a physical space. In a virtual cell, as in the standard model, team members and their equipment are dedicated to a family of products or services. Although people and equipment are physically dispersed, as in a job shop, their narrow product focus aims for and achieves quick throughput, with all its advantages, just as if the equipment were moved into a cellular cluster.[15] Lacking the visibility of physical cells, virtual cells may employ the discipline of kanban rules in order to tightly link the flows from process to process.
A simple but rather complete description of cell implementation comes from a 1985 booklet of 96 pages by Kone Corp. in Finland, producer of elevators, escalators, and the like. Excerpts follow:

"The first step involved creating cells in the assembly, electrical and chemical testing departments. In April 1984 six cells, identified by different colors, were established... All devices manufactured in cells are identified by the cell's color, and all feed-back from quality control is directed straight to the workers of the cell concerned... The second step, in summer, 1984, was to "cellularize" manufacture of the analyzer subassemblies [that are] needed in the analyzer cells, and to test them if necessary. Production of the five sub-assembly cells consists exclusively of certain analyzer sub-units. The parts and materials are located in the cells... Material control between the cells is based on the pull system and actual demand. In the analyzer cells there is a buffer consisting of two pieces for each (roughly 25 different) sub-unit. When one piece is taken into assembly, a new one is ordered from the corresponding unit-cell. The order is made [using] a magnetic [kanban] button, which identifies the ordering cell (by color), unit (by code), and order date... When the manufacturing cell has completed the order, the unit is taken with the [kanban] button to its place on the ordering cell shelf. Orders from the unit cells to the sub-cells are based on the same principle. The only difference is that the buffer size is six sub-units. This [procedure] was implemented in August, 1984."[16]

Implementation process[edit]
In order to implement cellular manufacturing, a number of steps must be performed. First, the parts to be made must be grouped by similarity (in design or manufacturing requirements) into families.[17] Then a systematic analysis of each family must be performed; typically in the form of production flow analysis (PFA) for manufacturing families, or in the examination of design/product data for design families.[17] This analysis can be time consuming and costly, but is important because a cell needs to be created for each family of parts.
There are also a number of mathematical models and algorithms to aid in planning a cellular manufacturing center, which take into account a variety of important variables such as, "multiple plant locations, multi-market allocations with production planning and various part mix."[18] Once these variables are determined with a given level of uncertainty, optimizations can be performed to minimize factors such as, "total cost of holding, inter-cell material handling, external transportation, fixed cost for producing each part in each plant, machine and labor salaries."[18]
Difficulties in creating flow[edit]
The key to creating flow is continuous improvement to production processes. Upon implementation of cellular manufacturing, management commonly "encounters strong resistance from production workers".[1] It will be beneficial to allow the change to cellular manufacturing to happen gradually.
It is also difficult to fight the desire to have some inventory on hand. It is tempting, since it would be easier to recover from an employee suddenly having to take sick leave. Unfortunately, in cellular manufacturing, it is important to remember the main tenants: "You sink or swim together as a unit" and that "Inventory hides problems and inefficiencies."[1] If the problems are not identified and subsequently resolved, the process will not improve.
Another common set of problems stems from the need to transfer materials between operations. These problems include, "exceptional elements, number of voids, machine distances, bottleneck machines and parts, machine location and relocation, part routing, cell load variation, inter and intracellular material transferring, cell reconfiguring, dynamic part demands, and operation and completion times."[19] These difficulties need to be considered and addressed to create efficient flow in cellular manufacturing.
Benefits and costs[edit]
Cellular manufacturing brings scattered processes together to form short, focused paths in concentrated physical space. So constructed, by logic a cell reduces flow time, flow distance, floor space, inventory, handling, scheduling transactions, and scrap and rework (the latter because of quick discovery of nonconformities). Moreover, cells lead to simplified, higher validity costing, since the costs of producing items are contained within the cell rather scattered in distance and the passage of reporting time.[20][21]
Cellular manufacturing facilitates both production and quality control.[17] Cells that are underperforming in either volume or quality can be easily isolated and targeted for improvement. The segmentation of the production process allows problems to be easily located and it is more clear which parts are affected by the problem.
There are also a number of benefits for employees working in cellular manufacturing. The small cell structure improves group cohesiveness and scales the manufacturing process down to a more manageable level for the workers.[17] Workers can more easily see problems or possible improvements within their own cells and tend to be more self-motivated to propose changes.[17] Additionally, these improvements that are instigated by the workers themselves cause less and less need for management, so over time overhead costs can be reduced.[17] Furthermore, the workers often are able to rotate between tasks within their cell, which offers variety in their work. This can further increase efficiency because work monotony has been linked to absenteeism and reduced production quality.[18]
Case studies in just-in-time and lean manufacturing are replete with impressive quantitative measures along those lines. For example, BAE Systems, Platform Solutions (Fort Wayne, Ind.), producing aircraft engine monitors and controls, implemented cells for 80 percent of production, reducing customer lead time 90 percent, work-in-process inventory 70 percent, space for one product family from 6,000 square feet to 1,200 square feet, while increasing product reliability 300 percent, multi-skilling the union-shop work force, and being designated an Industry Week Best Plant for the year 2000.[22] By five years later, rework and scrap had been cut 50 percent, new product introduction cycles 60 percent, and transactions 90 percent, while also increasing inventory turns three-fold and service turn times 30 percent, and being awarded a Shingo Prize for the year 2005.[23]
It appears to be difficult to isolate how much of those benefits accrue from cellular organization itself; among many case studies researched for this article few include attempts at isolating the benefits. One exception is the contention, at Steward, Inc. (Chattanooga, Tenn.), producing nickel zinc ferrite parts for electromagnetic interference suppression. According to case study authors, cells resulted in reductions of cycle time from 14 to 2 days, work-in-process inventories by 80 percent, finished inventories by 60 percent, lateness by 96 percent, and space by 56 percent.[24]
Another cellular case study includes quantitative estimates of the extent to which cells contributed to overall benefits. At Hughes Ground Systems Group (Fullerton, Calif.), producing circuit cards for defense equipment, the first cell, which began as a pilot project with 15 volunteers, was launched in 1987. One month later a second cell began, and by 1992 all production employees, numbering about 150, had been integrated into seven cells. Prior to cells, circuit card cycle time, from kit release to shipment to the customer, had been 38 weeks. After the cells had taken over the full production sequence (mechanical assembly, wave solder, thermal cycle, and conformal coat), cycle time had fallen to 30.5 weeks, of which production manager John Reiss attributed 20 weeks to use of a "WIP chart system" by the cell teams and the other 10.5 weeks to the cellular organization itself. Later, when it seemed that the cells were overly large and cumbersome, cell sizes were shrunk by two-thirds, resulting in “micro cells” that cut cycle time by another 1.5 weeks. Finally, by adopting certain other improvements, cycle times had decreased to four weeks. Other improvements included reducing work-in-process inventory from 6 or 7 days to one day and percent defective from 0.04 to 0.01[25] Switching from a functional (job-shop) layout to cells often costs has a minus net cost, inasmuch as the cell reduces costs of transport, work-in-process and finished inventory, transactions, and rework.[26] When large, heavy, expensive pieces of equipment (sometimes called “monuments” in lean lingo) must be moved, however, the initial costs can be high to the point where cells are not feasible.[27]
There are a number of possible limitations to implementing cellular manufacturing. Some argue that cellular manufacturing can lead to a decrease in production flexibility.[17] Cells are typically designed to maintain a specific flow volume of parts being produced. Should the demand or necessary quantity decrease, the cells may have to be realigned to match the new requirements, which is a costly operation, and one not typically required in other manufacturing setups.[17]
See also[edit]

Cross-training (business)
World class manufacturing

References[edit]



^ a b c d e f g h Liker, Jeffery (2004). The Toyota Way. New York: McGraw Hill. pp. 31, 96–101. 
^ 5. Flanders, R.E. 1925. Design, manufacture, and production control of a standard machine. Transactions of ASME, Vol. 26, 691-738.
^ 6. Mitrofanov, S.P. 1959. The scientific principles of group technology. Leningrad (trans. By J.L. Grayson, Birmingham University).
^ 4. Burbidge, J.L. 1975. The Introduction to Group Technology. New York: John Wiley.
^ Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 20
^ 7. Hall, Robert W. 1983. Zero Inventories. Homewood, Ill., Dow Jones-Irwin. pp 120-126
^ 8. Harmon, R.L., and L.D. Peterson. 1990. Reinventing the Factory: Productivity Breakthroughs in Manufacturing Today. New York: Free Press. pp 118-123
^ 2. Black, J. T., and Steve L. Hunter. 2003. op. cit.
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 573-617
^ a b Morgan, J.M. (2006). The Toyota Product Development System. New York: Productivity Press. p. 97. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 4
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 332-338
^ 3. Hall, Robert W. 1987. op. cit., p 92
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., p 5
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 27, 136, 585-586
^ "JIT-Production." Hyvinkaa, Finland: Kone Corporation/ATF
^ a b c d e f g h Inman, R. Anthony; Helm, Marilyn (2006). Encyclopedia of Management. Detroit, MI: Gale Cengage Learning. pp. 72–78. ISBN 978-0-7876-6556-2. 
^ a b c Aalaei, Amin; Davoudpour, Hamid. "A robust optimization model for cellular manufacturing system into supply chain management". International Journal of Production Economics. doi:10.1016/j.ijpe.2016.01.014. 
^ Delgoshaei, Aidin; Ariffin, Mohd Khairol Anuar Mohd; Leman, Zulkiflle; Baharudin, B. T. Hang Tuah Bin; Gomes, Chandima (2016-01-12). "Review of evolution of cellular manufacturing system’s approaches: Material transferring models". International Journal of Precision Engineering and Manufacturing. 17 (1): 131–149. ISSN 2234-7593. doi:10.1007/s12541-016-0017-9. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. Chapter 10: Cost Accounting and Cellular Manufacturing, pp 281-310)
^ Frecka, Thomas J. Accounting for Manufacturing Productivity: A Set of Papers from an AME Meeting--Problems and Directions in Cost Accounting. Association for Manufacturing Excellence, 2nd Printing. Several of the 11 articles in this report pertain to changes in cost accounting stemming from JIT production, and cells in particular.
^ 9. Sheridan, John L. 2000. “Lean Sigma synergy,” Industry Week (October 16) pp 81-82.
^ 10. 2005 Shingo Prize website.
^ 11. Levasseur, Gerls A., Marilyn M. Helms, and Aleisha A. Zink. 1995. “A Conversion from a functional to a cellular manufacturing layout at Steward, Inc. Production and Inventory Management. 3rd quarter, pp 37-42.
^ Tonkin, Lea A.P. 1992. Hughes Ground Systems Group Takes Aim at Defects, Delays. Target (May–June). pp 25-27
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 225-232
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op cit., pp 519-521



Further reading[edit]

Anbumalar, V.; Raja Chandra Sekar, M (December 2015). "METHODS FOR SOLVING CELL FORMATION, STATIC LAYOUT AND DYNAMIC LAYOUT CELLULAR MANUFACTURING SYSTEM PROBLEMS: A REVIEW" (PDF). Asian Journal of Science and Technology.
Black, J. T. (1991). The Design of the Factory with a Future, New York, NY: McGraw-Hill, Inc., 1991.
Black, J. T. (2000). 'Lean Manufacturing Implementation', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 177-86.
Burbidge, J.L. (1978), The Principles of Production Control, MacDonald and Evans, England, ISBN 0-7121-1676-1.
Brandon, John. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing: Integrating Technology and Management, Somerset, England: Research Studies Press LTD.
Feld, William M., (2001). Lean Manufacturing: tools, techniques, and how to use them, Boca Raton, FL; Alexandria, VA: St. Lucie Press; Apics.
Hyer, N.; Brown, K.A. 2003. Work cells with staying power: lessons for process-complete operations. California Management Review 46/1 (Fall): 37-52.
Houshyar, A. Nouri; Leman, Z; Pakzad Moghadam, H; Sulaiman, R (August 2014). "Review on Cellular Manufacturing System and its Components". International Journal of Engineering and Advanced Technology (IJEAT).
İşlier, Attila (2015-01-01). "Cellular Manufacturing Systems: Organization, Trends And Innovative Methods". Alphanumeric Journal 3 (2). ISSN 2148-2225
Irani, Shahrukh. (1999). Handbook of Cellular Manufacturing Systems, New York, NY: John Wiley & Sons, Inc., 1999.
Kannan, V.R. 1996. A virtual cellular manufacturing approach to batch production. Decision Sciences. 27 (3), 519-539.
McLean, C.R., H.M. Bloom, and T.H. Hopp. 1982. The virtual manufacturing cell. Proceedings of the Fourth IFAC/IFIP Conference on Information Control Problems in Manufacturing Technology. Gaithersburg, Md. (October).
Singh, Nanua and Divakar Rajamani. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing Systems Design, Planning and Control, London, UK: Chapman & Hall.
Schonberger, R.J. 2004. Make work cells work for you. Quality Progress 3/74 (April 2004): 58-63.
Swamdimass, Paul M. and Darlow, Neil R. (2000). 'Manufacturing Strategy', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 17-24.







v
t
e


Lean manufacturing tools






Cellular manufacturing
Takt time
Standardized work
Continuous-flow manufacturing
Kanban
5 Whys
Single-Minute Exchange of Die
Poka-yoke
Production leveling
Total productive maintenance
5S (methodology)
PDCA









Authority control



NDL: 01007879










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Cellular_manufacturing&oldid=783215872"					
Categories: Lean manufacturingProcess managementManufacturingProduction and manufacturingCommercial item transport and distributionManagementInventoryHidden categories: Articles with too few wikilinks from July 2015All articles with too few wikilinksArticles covered by WikiProject Wikify from July 2015All articles covered by WikiProject Wikify 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolNederlands日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 31 May 2017, at 21:12.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









William M Feld - Brooklyn, NY | Intelius



























Sign In



We found William M Feld in Brooklyn, NY


William M Feld

                                                                           Intelius found that William M Feld  is  a male between 70 and 80 years old from Brooklyn, NY.  We have connected them to
                2 addresses,
                2 phones,
                and 2 relatives or associates.
         






Get Report Now

Age

William M Feld is in his 70s

William Has Lived In

Brooklyn, NY
Manchester, CT

William's Relatives

Judith Feld
Michele Feld







William M Feld



Zodiac SignGemini



GenderMale



Professional Status
Vice President and General Manager at Lydall , Inc.



Get Report Now










Want to know more about William? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about William, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on William M Feld
Get a Criminal Check on William M Feld
Get a Public Record Report on William M Feld
Get a People Search Report on William M Feld


William M Feld's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where William M Feld has lived as well as William M Feld's phone numbers and email addresses.




William M Feld Has Lived in 2 States
New York Address for William M Feld


1773 R******* P*** 

Brooklyn, NY


Has Lived In

Brooklyn, NY
Manchester, CT


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with William M Feld

(718) ***-**** - Brooklyn, NY 
(336) ***-****


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with William M Feld

g******8@***.com
b***d@***.com


Get Email Report




William M Feld's Professional Information
Information regarding William M Feld's professional history.  Find out previous places William M Feld has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


William M Feld Has Worked at 1 Place
Company: Lydall , Inc.
               Title: Vice President and General Manager
William M Feld's Experience
Title: Vice President and General Manager
               Company: Lydall , Inc.
Job Details
               Lydall, Inc. (LDL) is a New York Stock Exchange listed company, headquartered in Manchester, Connecticut. The Company, with operations in the U.S., France, the Netherlands, Germany, and China, and sales offices in the U.S., Europe, and Asia, focuses on manufacturing specialty engineered products for the thermal/acoustical, filtration/separation, and bio/medical markets.
Additional Professional Information on William M Feld

 See William M Feld's LinkedIn Profile



William M Feld's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for William M Feld


William M Feld's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of William M Feld's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
William Feld
Username Matches

                  WilliamFeld
                  FeldWilliam
                  William.Feld
                  Feld.William
                  William_Feld
                  Feld_William
                  William-Feld
                  Feld-William
                  WFeld
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
W Feld







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.














Cellular manufacturing - Wikipedia





















 






Cellular manufacturing

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs more links to other articles to help integrate it into the encyclopedia. Please help improve this article by adding links that are relevant to the context within the existing text. (July 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Cellular manufacturing is a process of manufacturing which is a subsection of just-in-time manufacturing and lean manufacturing encompassing group technology. The goal of cellular manufacturing is to move as quickly as possible, make a wide variety of similar products, while making as little waste as possible. Cellular manufacturing involves the use of multiple "cells" in an assembly line fashion. Each of these cells is composed of one or multiple different machines which accomplish a certain task. The product moves from one cell to the next, each station completing part of the manufacturing process. Often the cells are arranged in a "U-shape" design because this allows for the overseer to move less and have the ability to more readily watch over the entire process. One of the biggest advantages of cellular manufacturing is the amount of flexibility that it has. Since most of the machines are automatic, simple changes can be made very rapidly. This allows for a variety of scaling for a product, minor changes to the overall design, and in extreme cases, entirely changing the overall design. These changes, although tedious, can be accomplished extremely quickly and precisely.[1]
A cell is created by consolidating the processes required to create a specific output, such as a part or a set of instructions. These cells allow for the reduction of extraneous steps in the process of creating the specific output, and facilitate quick identification of problems and encourage communication of employees within the cell in order to resolve issues that arise quickly. Once implemented, cellular manufacturing has been said to reliably create massive gains in productivity and quality while simultaneously reducing the amount of inventory, space and lead time required to create a product. It is for this reason that the one-piece-flow cell has been called "the ultimate in lean production."[1]



Contents


1 History
2 Cell design
3 Implementation process
4 Difficulties in creating flow
5 Benefits and costs
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading



History[edit]
Cellular manufacturing is derivative of principles of group technology, which were proposed by Flanders in 1925[2] and adopted in Russia by Mitrofanov in 1933 (whose book[3] was translated into English in 1959). Burbidge actively promoted group technology in the 1970s.[4] "Apparently, Japanese firms began implementing cellular manufacturing sometime in the 1970s," and in the 1980s cells migrated to the United States as an element of just-in-time (JIT) production.[5]
One of the first English-language books to discuss cellular manufacturing, that of Hall in 1983, referred to a cell as a “U-line,” for the common, or ideal, U-shaped configuration of a cell[6]—ideal because that shape puts all cell processes and operatives into a cluster, affording high visibility and contact. By 1990 cells had come to be treated as foundation practices in JIT manufacturing, so much so that Harmon and Peterson, in their book, Reinventing the Factory, included a section entitled, "Cell: Fundamental Factory of the Future".[7] Cellular manufacturing was carried forward in the 1990s, when just-in-time was renamed lean manufacturing.[8] Finally, when JIT/lean became widely attractive in the service sector, cellular concepts found their way into that realm; for example, Hyer and Wemmerlöv’s final chapter is devoted to office cells.[9]
Cell design[edit]
Cells are created in a workplace to facilitate flow. This is accomplished by bringing together operations (or machines, or people) involved in a processing sequence of a products natural flow and grouping them close to one another, distinct from other groups. This grouping is called a cell. These cells are used to improve many factors in a manufacturing setting by allowing one-piece flow to occur.[1][10] An example of one-piece flow would be in the production of a metallic case part that arrives at the factory from the vendor in separate pieces, requiring assembly. First, the pieces would be moved from storage to the cell, where they would be welded together, then polished, then coated, and finally packaged. All of these steps would be completed in a single cell, so as to minimize various factors (called non-value-added processes/steps) such as time required to transport materials between steps. Some common formats of single cells are: the U-shape (good for communication and quick movement of workers), the straight line, or the L-shape. The number of workers inside these formations depend on current demand and can be modulated to increase or decrease production. For example, if a cell is normally occupied by two workers and demand is doubled, four workers should be placed in the cell. Similarly, if demand halves, one worker will occupy the cell. Since cells have a variety of differing equipment, it is therefore a requirement that any employee is skilled at multiple processes.[1]




This figure from The Toyota Way shows the design of a U-shaped cell, graphing the paths of two employees through it.


While there exist many advantages to forming cells, there are some obvious benefits. It is quickly evident from observation of cells where inefficiencies lie, such as when an employee is too busy or relatively inactive. Resolving these inefficiencies can increase production and productivity by up to and above 100% in many cases. In addition to this, formation of cells consistently frees up floor space in the manufacturing/assembly environment (by having inventory only where it is absolutely required), improves safety in the work environment (due to smaller quantities of product/inventory being handled), improves morale (by imparting feelings of accomplishment and satisfaction in employees), reduces cost of inventory, and reducing inventory obsolescence.[1]
When formation of a cell would be too difficult, a simple principle is applied in order to improve efficiencies and flow, that is, to perform processes in a specific location and gather materials to that point at a rate dictated by an average of customer demand (this rate is called the takt time). This is referred to as the Pacemaker Process.[10]
Despite the advantages of designing for one-piece-flow, the formation of a cell must be carefully considered before implementation. Use of costly and complex equipment that tends to break down can cause massive delays in the production and will ruin output until they can be brought back online.[1]

"A cell is a small organizational unit...designed to exploit similarities in how you process information, make products, and serve customers. Manufacturing cells [closely locate] people and equipment required for processing families of like products. [Prior to cellularization, parts] may have traveled miles to visit all the equipment and labor needed for their fabrication... After reorganization, families of similar parts are produced together within the physical confines of cells that house most or all of the required resources,...facilitating the rapid flow and efficient processing of material and information... Furthermore, cell operators can be cross-trained in several machines, engage in job rotation, and assume responsibilities for tasks [that] previously belonged to supervisors and support staff [including] activities such as planning and scheduling, quality control, trouble-shooting, parts ordering, interfacing with customers and suppliers, and record-keeping."[11]

The short travel distances within cells serve to quicken the flows. Moreover, the compactness of a cell minimizes space that might allow build-ups of inventory between cell stations. To formalize that advantage, cells often have designed-in rules or physical devices that limit the amount of inventory between stations. Such a rule is known, in JIT/lean parlance, as kanban (from the Japanese), which establishes a maximum number of units allowable between a providing and a using work station. (Discussion and illustrations of cells in combinations with kanban are found in[12]) The simplest form, kanban squares, are marked areas on floors or tables between work stations. The rule, applied to the producing station: "If all squares are full, stop. If not, fill them up."[13]
An office cell applies the same ideas: clusters of broadly trained cell-team members that, in concert, quickly handle all of the processing for a family of services or customers.[14]
A virtual cell is a variation in which all cell resources are not brought together in a physical space. In a virtual cell, as in the standard model, team members and their equipment are dedicated to a family of products or services. Although people and equipment are physically dispersed, as in a job shop, their narrow product focus aims for and achieves quick throughput, with all its advantages, just as if the equipment were moved into a cellular cluster.[15] Lacking the visibility of physical cells, virtual cells may employ the discipline of kanban rules in order to tightly link the flows from process to process.
A simple but rather complete description of cell implementation comes from a 1985 booklet of 96 pages by Kone Corp. in Finland, producer of elevators, escalators, and the like. Excerpts follow:

"The first step involved creating cells in the assembly, electrical and chemical testing departments. In April 1984 six cells, identified by different colors, were established... All devices manufactured in cells are identified by the cell's color, and all feed-back from quality control is directed straight to the workers of the cell concerned... The second step, in summer, 1984, was to "cellularize" manufacture of the analyzer subassemblies [that are] needed in the analyzer cells, and to test them if necessary. Production of the five sub-assembly cells consists exclusively of certain analyzer sub-units. The parts and materials are located in the cells... Material control between the cells is based on the pull system and actual demand. In the analyzer cells there is a buffer consisting of two pieces for each (roughly 25 different) sub-unit. When one piece is taken into assembly, a new one is ordered from the corresponding unit-cell. The order is made [using] a magnetic [kanban] button, which identifies the ordering cell (by color), unit (by code), and order date... When the manufacturing cell has completed the order, the unit is taken with the [kanban] button to its place on the ordering cell shelf. Orders from the unit cells to the sub-cells are based on the same principle. The only difference is that the buffer size is six sub-units. This [procedure] was implemented in August, 1984."[16]

Implementation process[edit]
In order to implement cellular manufacturing, a number of steps must be performed. First, the parts to be made must be grouped by similarity (in design or manufacturing requirements) into families.[17] Then a systematic analysis of each family must be performed; typically in the form of production flow analysis (PFA) for manufacturing families, or in the examination of design/product data for design families.[17] This analysis can be time consuming and costly, but is important because a cell needs to be created for each family of parts.
There are also a number of mathematical models and algorithms to aid in planning a cellular manufacturing center, which take into account a variety of important variables such as, "multiple plant locations, multi-market allocations with production planning and various part mix."[18] Once these variables are determined with a given level of uncertainty, optimizations can be performed to minimize factors such as, "total cost of holding, inter-cell material handling, external transportation, fixed cost for producing each part in each plant, machine and labor salaries."[18]
Difficulties in creating flow[edit]
The key to creating flow is continuous improvement to production processes. Upon implementation of cellular manufacturing, management commonly "encounters strong resistance from production workers".[1] It will be beneficial to allow the change to cellular manufacturing to happen gradually.
It is also difficult to fight the desire to have some inventory on hand. It is tempting, since it would be easier to recover from an employee suddenly having to take sick leave. Unfortunately, in cellular manufacturing, it is important to remember the main tenants: "You sink or swim together as a unit" and that "Inventory hides problems and inefficiencies."[1] If the problems are not identified and subsequently resolved, the process will not improve.
Another common set of problems stems from the need to transfer materials between operations. These problems include, "exceptional elements, number of voids, machine distances, bottleneck machines and parts, machine location and relocation, part routing, cell load variation, inter and intracellular material transferring, cell reconfiguring, dynamic part demands, and operation and completion times."[19] These difficulties need to be considered and addressed to create efficient flow in cellular manufacturing.
Benefits and costs[edit]
Cellular manufacturing brings scattered processes together to form short, focused paths in concentrated physical space. So constructed, by logic a cell reduces flow time, flow distance, floor space, inventory, handling, scheduling transactions, and scrap and rework (the latter because of quick discovery of nonconformities). Moreover, cells lead to simplified, higher validity costing, since the costs of producing items are contained within the cell rather scattered in distance and the passage of reporting time.[20][21]
Cellular manufacturing facilitates both production and quality control.[17] Cells that are underperforming in either volume or quality can be easily isolated and targeted for improvement. The segmentation of the production process allows problems to be easily located and it is more clear which parts are affected by the problem.
There are also a number of benefits for employees working in cellular manufacturing. The small cell structure improves group cohesiveness and scales the manufacturing process down to a more manageable level for the workers.[17] Workers can more easily see problems or possible improvements within their own cells and tend to be more self-motivated to propose changes.[17] Additionally, these improvements that are instigated by the workers themselves cause less and less need for management, so over time overhead costs can be reduced.[17] Furthermore, the workers often are able to rotate between tasks within their cell, which offers variety in their work. This can further increase efficiency because work monotony has been linked to absenteeism and reduced production quality.[18]
Case studies in just-in-time and lean manufacturing are replete with impressive quantitative measures along those lines. For example, BAE Systems, Platform Solutions (Fort Wayne, Ind.), producing aircraft engine monitors and controls, implemented cells for 80 percent of production, reducing customer lead time 90 percent, work-in-process inventory 70 percent, space for one product family from 6,000 square feet to 1,200 square feet, while increasing product reliability 300 percent, multi-skilling the union-shop work force, and being designated an Industry Week Best Plant for the year 2000.[22] By five years later, rework and scrap had been cut 50 percent, new product introduction cycles 60 percent, and transactions 90 percent, while also increasing inventory turns three-fold and service turn times 30 percent, and being awarded a Shingo Prize for the year 2005.[23]
It appears to be difficult to isolate how much of those benefits accrue from cellular organization itself; among many case studies researched for this article few include attempts at isolating the benefits. One exception is the contention, at Steward, Inc. (Chattanooga, Tenn.), producing nickel zinc ferrite parts for electromagnetic interference suppression. According to case study authors, cells resulted in reductions of cycle time from 14 to 2 days, work-in-process inventories by 80 percent, finished inventories by 60 percent, lateness by 96 percent, and space by 56 percent.[24]
Another cellular case study includes quantitative estimates of the extent to which cells contributed to overall benefits. At Hughes Ground Systems Group (Fullerton, Calif.), producing circuit cards for defense equipment, the first cell, which began as a pilot project with 15 volunteers, was launched in 1987. One month later a second cell began, and by 1992 all production employees, numbering about 150, had been integrated into seven cells. Prior to cells, circuit card cycle time, from kit release to shipment to the customer, had been 38 weeks. After the cells had taken over the full production sequence (mechanical assembly, wave solder, thermal cycle, and conformal coat), cycle time had fallen to 30.5 weeks, of which production manager John Reiss attributed 20 weeks to use of a "WIP chart system" by the cell teams and the other 10.5 weeks to the cellular organization itself. Later, when it seemed that the cells were overly large and cumbersome, cell sizes were shrunk by two-thirds, resulting in “micro cells” that cut cycle time by another 1.5 weeks. Finally, by adopting certain other improvements, cycle times had decreased to four weeks. Other improvements included reducing work-in-process inventory from 6 or 7 days to one day and percent defective from 0.04 to 0.01[25] Switching from a functional (job-shop) layout to cells often costs has a minus net cost, inasmuch as the cell reduces costs of transport, work-in-process and finished inventory, transactions, and rework.[26] When large, heavy, expensive pieces of equipment (sometimes called “monuments” in lean lingo) must be moved, however, the initial costs can be high to the point where cells are not feasible.[27]
There are a number of possible limitations to implementing cellular manufacturing. Some argue that cellular manufacturing can lead to a decrease in production flexibility.[17] Cells are typically designed to maintain a specific flow volume of parts being produced. Should the demand or necessary quantity decrease, the cells may have to be realigned to match the new requirements, which is a costly operation, and one not typically required in other manufacturing setups.[17]
See also[edit]

Cross-training (business)
World class manufacturing

References[edit]



^ a b c d e f g h Liker, Jeffery (2004). The Toyota Way. New York: McGraw Hill. pp. 31, 96–101. 
^ 5. Flanders, R.E. 1925. Design, manufacture, and production control of a standard machine. Transactions of ASME, Vol. 26, 691-738.
^ 6. Mitrofanov, S.P. 1959. The scientific principles of group technology. Leningrad (trans. By J.L. Grayson, Birmingham University).
^ 4. Burbidge, J.L. 1975. The Introduction to Group Technology. New York: John Wiley.
^ Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 20
^ 7. Hall, Robert W. 1983. Zero Inventories. Homewood, Ill., Dow Jones-Irwin. pp 120-126
^ 8. Harmon, R.L., and L.D. Peterson. 1990. Reinventing the Factory: Productivity Breakthroughs in Manufacturing Today. New York: Free Press. pp 118-123
^ 2. Black, J. T., and Steve L. Hunter. 2003. op. cit.
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 573-617
^ a b Morgan, J.M. (2006). The Toyota Product Development System. New York: Productivity Press. p. 97. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 4
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 332-338
^ 3. Hall, Robert W. 1987. op. cit., p 92
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., p 5
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 27, 136, 585-586
^ "JIT-Production." Hyvinkaa, Finland: Kone Corporation/ATF
^ a b c d e f g h Inman, R. Anthony; Helm, Marilyn (2006). Encyclopedia of Management. Detroit, MI: Gale Cengage Learning. pp. 72–78. ISBN 978-0-7876-6556-2. 
^ a b c Aalaei, Amin; Davoudpour, Hamid. "A robust optimization model for cellular manufacturing system into supply chain management". International Journal of Production Economics. doi:10.1016/j.ijpe.2016.01.014. 
^ Delgoshaei, Aidin; Ariffin, Mohd Khairol Anuar Mohd; Leman, Zulkiflle; Baharudin, B. T. Hang Tuah Bin; Gomes, Chandima (2016-01-12). "Review of evolution of cellular manufacturing system’s approaches: Material transferring models". International Journal of Precision Engineering and Manufacturing. 17 (1): 131–149. ISSN 2234-7593. doi:10.1007/s12541-016-0017-9. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. Chapter 10: Cost Accounting and Cellular Manufacturing, pp 281-310)
^ Frecka, Thomas J. Accounting for Manufacturing Productivity: A Set of Papers from an AME Meeting--Problems and Directions in Cost Accounting. Association for Manufacturing Excellence, 2nd Printing. Several of the 11 articles in this report pertain to changes in cost accounting stemming from JIT production, and cells in particular.
^ 9. Sheridan, John L. 2000. “Lean Sigma synergy,” Industry Week (October 16) pp 81-82.
^ 10. 2005 Shingo Prize website.
^ 11. Levasseur, Gerls A., Marilyn M. Helms, and Aleisha A. Zink. 1995. “A Conversion from a functional to a cellular manufacturing layout at Steward, Inc. Production and Inventory Management. 3rd quarter, pp 37-42.
^ Tonkin, Lea A.P. 1992. Hughes Ground Systems Group Takes Aim at Defects, Delays. Target (May–June). pp 25-27
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 225-232
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op cit., pp 519-521



Further reading[edit]

Anbumalar, V.; Raja Chandra Sekar, M (December 2015). "METHODS FOR SOLVING CELL FORMATION, STATIC LAYOUT AND DYNAMIC LAYOUT CELLULAR MANUFACTURING SYSTEM PROBLEMS: A REVIEW" (PDF). Asian Journal of Science and Technology.
Black, J. T. (1991). The Design of the Factory with a Future, New York, NY: McGraw-Hill, Inc., 1991.
Black, J. T. (2000). 'Lean Manufacturing Implementation', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 177-86.
Burbidge, J.L. (1978), The Principles of Production Control, MacDonald and Evans, England, ISBN 0-7121-1676-1.
Brandon, John. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing: Integrating Technology and Management, Somerset, England: Research Studies Press LTD.
Feld, William M., (2001). Lean Manufacturing: tools, techniques, and how to use them, Boca Raton, FL; Alexandria, VA: St. Lucie Press; Apics.
Hyer, N.; Brown, K.A. 2003. Work cells with staying power: lessons for process-complete operations. California Management Review 46/1 (Fall): 37-52.
Houshyar, A. Nouri; Leman, Z; Pakzad Moghadam, H; Sulaiman, R (August 2014). "Review on Cellular Manufacturing System and its Components". International Journal of Engineering and Advanced Technology (IJEAT).
İşlier, Attila (2015-01-01). "Cellular Manufacturing Systems: Organization, Trends And Innovative Methods". Alphanumeric Journal 3 (2). ISSN 2148-2225
Irani, Shahrukh. (1999). Handbook of Cellular Manufacturing Systems, New York, NY: John Wiley & Sons, Inc., 1999.
Kannan, V.R. 1996. A virtual cellular manufacturing approach to batch production. Decision Sciences. 27 (3), 519-539.
McLean, C.R., H.M. Bloom, and T.H. Hopp. 1982. The virtual manufacturing cell. Proceedings of the Fourth IFAC/IFIP Conference on Information Control Problems in Manufacturing Technology. Gaithersburg, Md. (October).
Singh, Nanua and Divakar Rajamani. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing Systems Design, Planning and Control, London, UK: Chapman & Hall.
Schonberger, R.J. 2004. Make work cells work for you. Quality Progress 3/74 (April 2004): 58-63.
Swamdimass, Paul M. and Darlow, Neil R. (2000). 'Manufacturing Strategy', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 17-24.







v
t
e


Lean manufacturing tools






Cellular manufacturing
Takt time
Standardized work
Continuous-flow manufacturing
Kanban
5 Whys
Single-Minute Exchange of Die
Poka-yoke
Production leveling
Total productive maintenance
5S (methodology)
PDCA









Authority control



NDL: 01007879










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Cellular_manufacturing&oldid=783215872"					
Categories: Lean manufacturingProcess managementManufacturingProduction and manufacturingCommercial item transport and distributionManagementInventoryHidden categories: Articles with too few wikilinks from July 2015All articles with too few wikilinksArticles covered by WikiProject Wikify from July 2015All articles covered by WikiProject Wikify 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolNederlands日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 31 May 2017, at 21:12.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Cellular manufacturing - Wikipedia





















 






Cellular manufacturing

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article needs more links to other articles to help integrate it into the encyclopedia. Please help improve this article by adding links that are relevant to the context within the existing text. (July 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Cellular manufacturing is a process of manufacturing which is a subsection of just-in-time manufacturing and lean manufacturing encompassing group technology. The goal of cellular manufacturing is to move as quickly as possible, make a wide variety of similar products, while making as little waste as possible. Cellular manufacturing involves the use of multiple "cells" in an assembly line fashion. Each of these cells is composed of one or multiple different machines which accomplish a certain task. The product moves from one cell to the next, each station completing part of the manufacturing process. Often the cells are arranged in a "U-shape" design because this allows for the overseer to move less and have the ability to more readily watch over the entire process. One of the biggest advantages of cellular manufacturing is the amount of flexibility that it has. Since most of the machines are automatic, simple changes can be made very rapidly. This allows for a variety of scaling for a product, minor changes to the overall design, and in extreme cases, entirely changing the overall design. These changes, although tedious, can be accomplished extremely quickly and precisely.[1]
A cell is created by consolidating the processes required to create a specific output, such as a part or a set of instructions. These cells allow for the reduction of extraneous steps in the process of creating the specific output, and facilitate quick identification of problems and encourage communication of employees within the cell in order to resolve issues that arise quickly. Once implemented, cellular manufacturing has been said to reliably create massive gains in productivity and quality while simultaneously reducing the amount of inventory, space and lead time required to create a product. It is for this reason that the one-piece-flow cell has been called "the ultimate in lean production."[1]



Contents


1 History
2 Cell design
3 Implementation process
4 Difficulties in creating flow
5 Benefits and costs
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading



History[edit]
Cellular manufacturing is derivative of principles of group technology, which were proposed by Flanders in 1925[2] and adopted in Russia by Mitrofanov in 1933 (whose book[3] was translated into English in 1959). Burbidge actively promoted group technology in the 1970s.[4] "Apparently, Japanese firms began implementing cellular manufacturing sometime in the 1970s," and in the 1980s cells migrated to the United States as an element of just-in-time (JIT) production.[5]
One of the first English-language books to discuss cellular manufacturing, that of Hall in 1983, referred to a cell as a “U-line,” for the common, or ideal, U-shaped configuration of a cell[6]—ideal because that shape puts all cell processes and operatives into a cluster, affording high visibility and contact. By 1990 cells had come to be treated as foundation practices in JIT manufacturing, so much so that Harmon and Peterson, in their book, Reinventing the Factory, included a section entitled, "Cell: Fundamental Factory of the Future".[7] Cellular manufacturing was carried forward in the 1990s, when just-in-time was renamed lean manufacturing.[8] Finally, when JIT/lean became widely attractive in the service sector, cellular concepts found their way into that realm; for example, Hyer and Wemmerlöv’s final chapter is devoted to office cells.[9]
Cell design[edit]
Cells are created in a workplace to facilitate flow. This is accomplished by bringing together operations (or machines, or people) involved in a processing sequence of a products natural flow and grouping them close to one another, distinct from other groups. This grouping is called a cell. These cells are used to improve many factors in a manufacturing setting by allowing one-piece flow to occur.[1][10] An example of one-piece flow would be in the production of a metallic case part that arrives at the factory from the vendor in separate pieces, requiring assembly. First, the pieces would be moved from storage to the cell, where they would be welded together, then polished, then coated, and finally packaged. All of these steps would be completed in a single cell, so as to minimize various factors (called non-value-added processes/steps) such as time required to transport materials between steps. Some common formats of single cells are: the U-shape (good for communication and quick movement of workers), the straight line, or the L-shape. The number of workers inside these formations depend on current demand and can be modulated to increase or decrease production. For example, if a cell is normally occupied by two workers and demand is doubled, four workers should be placed in the cell. Similarly, if demand halves, one worker will occupy the cell. Since cells have a variety of differing equipment, it is therefore a requirement that any employee is skilled at multiple processes.[1]




This figure from The Toyota Way shows the design of a U-shaped cell, graphing the paths of two employees through it.


While there exist many advantages to forming cells, there are some obvious benefits. It is quickly evident from observation of cells where inefficiencies lie, such as when an employee is too busy or relatively inactive. Resolving these inefficiencies can increase production and productivity by up to and above 100% in many cases. In addition to this, formation of cells consistently frees up floor space in the manufacturing/assembly environment (by having inventory only where it is absolutely required), improves safety in the work environment (due to smaller quantities of product/inventory being handled), improves morale (by imparting feelings of accomplishment and satisfaction in employees), reduces cost of inventory, and reducing inventory obsolescence.[1]
When formation of a cell would be too difficult, a simple principle is applied in order to improve efficiencies and flow, that is, to perform processes in a specific location and gather materials to that point at a rate dictated by an average of customer demand (this rate is called the takt time). This is referred to as the Pacemaker Process.[10]
Despite the advantages of designing for one-piece-flow, the formation of a cell must be carefully considered before implementation. Use of costly and complex equipment that tends to break down can cause massive delays in the production and will ruin output until they can be brought back online.[1]

"A cell is a small organizational unit...designed to exploit similarities in how you process information, make products, and serve customers. Manufacturing cells [closely locate] people and equipment required for processing families of like products. [Prior to cellularization, parts] may have traveled miles to visit all the equipment and labor needed for their fabrication... After reorganization, families of similar parts are produced together within the physical confines of cells that house most or all of the required resources,...facilitating the rapid flow and efficient processing of material and information... Furthermore, cell operators can be cross-trained in several machines, engage in job rotation, and assume responsibilities for tasks [that] previously belonged to supervisors and support staff [including] activities such as planning and scheduling, quality control, trouble-shooting, parts ordering, interfacing with customers and suppliers, and record-keeping."[11]

The short travel distances within cells serve to quicken the flows. Moreover, the compactness of a cell minimizes space that might allow build-ups of inventory between cell stations. To formalize that advantage, cells often have designed-in rules or physical devices that limit the amount of inventory between stations. Such a rule is known, in JIT/lean parlance, as kanban (from the Japanese), which establishes a maximum number of units allowable between a providing and a using work station. (Discussion and illustrations of cells in combinations with kanban are found in[12]) The simplest form, kanban squares, are marked areas on floors or tables between work stations. The rule, applied to the producing station: "If all squares are full, stop. If not, fill them up."[13]
An office cell applies the same ideas: clusters of broadly trained cell-team members that, in concert, quickly handle all of the processing for a family of services or customers.[14]
A virtual cell is a variation in which all cell resources are not brought together in a physical space. In a virtual cell, as in the standard model, team members and their equipment are dedicated to a family of products or services. Although people and equipment are physically dispersed, as in a job shop, their narrow product focus aims for and achieves quick throughput, with all its advantages, just as if the equipment were moved into a cellular cluster.[15] Lacking the visibility of physical cells, virtual cells may employ the discipline of kanban rules in order to tightly link the flows from process to process.
A simple but rather complete description of cell implementation comes from a 1985 booklet of 96 pages by Kone Corp. in Finland, producer of elevators, escalators, and the like. Excerpts follow:

"The first step involved creating cells in the assembly, electrical and chemical testing departments. In April 1984 six cells, identified by different colors, were established... All devices manufactured in cells are identified by the cell's color, and all feed-back from quality control is directed straight to the workers of the cell concerned... The second step, in summer, 1984, was to "cellularize" manufacture of the analyzer subassemblies [that are] needed in the analyzer cells, and to test them if necessary. Production of the five sub-assembly cells consists exclusively of certain analyzer sub-units. The parts and materials are located in the cells... Material control between the cells is based on the pull system and actual demand. In the analyzer cells there is a buffer consisting of two pieces for each (roughly 25 different) sub-unit. When one piece is taken into assembly, a new one is ordered from the corresponding unit-cell. The order is made [using] a magnetic [kanban] button, which identifies the ordering cell (by color), unit (by code), and order date... When the manufacturing cell has completed the order, the unit is taken with the [kanban] button to its place on the ordering cell shelf. Orders from the unit cells to the sub-cells are based on the same principle. The only difference is that the buffer size is six sub-units. This [procedure] was implemented in August, 1984."[16]

Implementation process[edit]
In order to implement cellular manufacturing, a number of steps must be performed. First, the parts to be made must be grouped by similarity (in design or manufacturing requirements) into families.[17] Then a systematic analysis of each family must be performed; typically in the form of production flow analysis (PFA) for manufacturing families, or in the examination of design/product data for design families.[17] This analysis can be time consuming and costly, but is important because a cell needs to be created for each family of parts.
There are also a number of mathematical models and algorithms to aid in planning a cellular manufacturing center, which take into account a variety of important variables such as, "multiple plant locations, multi-market allocations with production planning and various part mix."[18] Once these variables are determined with a given level of uncertainty, optimizations can be performed to minimize factors such as, "total cost of holding, inter-cell material handling, external transportation, fixed cost for producing each part in each plant, machine and labor salaries."[18]
Difficulties in creating flow[edit]
The key to creating flow is continuous improvement to production processes. Upon implementation of cellular manufacturing, management commonly "encounters strong resistance from production workers".[1] It will be beneficial to allow the change to cellular manufacturing to happen gradually.
It is also difficult to fight the desire to have some inventory on hand. It is tempting, since it would be easier to recover from an employee suddenly having to take sick leave. Unfortunately, in cellular manufacturing, it is important to remember the main tenants: "You sink or swim together as a unit" and that "Inventory hides problems and inefficiencies."[1] If the problems are not identified and subsequently resolved, the process will not improve.
Another common set of problems stems from the need to transfer materials between operations. These problems include, "exceptional elements, number of voids, machine distances, bottleneck machines and parts, machine location and relocation, part routing, cell load variation, inter and intracellular material transferring, cell reconfiguring, dynamic part demands, and operation and completion times."[19] These difficulties need to be considered and addressed to create efficient flow in cellular manufacturing.
Benefits and costs[edit]
Cellular manufacturing brings scattered processes together to form short, focused paths in concentrated physical space. So constructed, by logic a cell reduces flow time, flow distance, floor space, inventory, handling, scheduling transactions, and scrap and rework (the latter because of quick discovery of nonconformities). Moreover, cells lead to simplified, higher validity costing, since the costs of producing items are contained within the cell rather scattered in distance and the passage of reporting time.[20][21]
Cellular manufacturing facilitates both production and quality control.[17] Cells that are underperforming in either volume or quality can be easily isolated and targeted for improvement. The segmentation of the production process allows problems to be easily located and it is more clear which parts are affected by the problem.
There are also a number of benefits for employees working in cellular manufacturing. The small cell structure improves group cohesiveness and scales the manufacturing process down to a more manageable level for the workers.[17] Workers can more easily see problems or possible improvements within their own cells and tend to be more self-motivated to propose changes.[17] Additionally, these improvements that are instigated by the workers themselves cause less and less need for management, so over time overhead costs can be reduced.[17] Furthermore, the workers often are able to rotate between tasks within their cell, which offers variety in their work. This can further increase efficiency because work monotony has been linked to absenteeism and reduced production quality.[18]
Case studies in just-in-time and lean manufacturing are replete with impressive quantitative measures along those lines. For example, BAE Systems, Platform Solutions (Fort Wayne, Ind.), producing aircraft engine monitors and controls, implemented cells for 80 percent of production, reducing customer lead time 90 percent, work-in-process inventory 70 percent, space for one product family from 6,000 square feet to 1,200 square feet, while increasing product reliability 300 percent, multi-skilling the union-shop work force, and being designated an Industry Week Best Plant for the year 2000.[22] By five years later, rework and scrap had been cut 50 percent, new product introduction cycles 60 percent, and transactions 90 percent, while also increasing inventory turns three-fold and service turn times 30 percent, and being awarded a Shingo Prize for the year 2005.[23]
It appears to be difficult to isolate how much of those benefits accrue from cellular organization itself; among many case studies researched for this article few include attempts at isolating the benefits. One exception is the contention, at Steward, Inc. (Chattanooga, Tenn.), producing nickel zinc ferrite parts for electromagnetic interference suppression. According to case study authors, cells resulted in reductions of cycle time from 14 to 2 days, work-in-process inventories by 80 percent, finished inventories by 60 percent, lateness by 96 percent, and space by 56 percent.[24]
Another cellular case study includes quantitative estimates of the extent to which cells contributed to overall benefits. At Hughes Ground Systems Group (Fullerton, Calif.), producing circuit cards for defense equipment, the first cell, which began as a pilot project with 15 volunteers, was launched in 1987. One month later a second cell began, and by 1992 all production employees, numbering about 150, had been integrated into seven cells. Prior to cells, circuit card cycle time, from kit release to shipment to the customer, had been 38 weeks. After the cells had taken over the full production sequence (mechanical assembly, wave solder, thermal cycle, and conformal coat), cycle time had fallen to 30.5 weeks, of which production manager John Reiss attributed 20 weeks to use of a "WIP chart system" by the cell teams and the other 10.5 weeks to the cellular organization itself. Later, when it seemed that the cells were overly large and cumbersome, cell sizes were shrunk by two-thirds, resulting in “micro cells” that cut cycle time by another 1.5 weeks. Finally, by adopting certain other improvements, cycle times had decreased to four weeks. Other improvements included reducing work-in-process inventory from 6 or 7 days to one day and percent defective from 0.04 to 0.01[25] Switching from a functional (job-shop) layout to cells often costs has a minus net cost, inasmuch as the cell reduces costs of transport, work-in-process and finished inventory, transactions, and rework.[26] When large, heavy, expensive pieces of equipment (sometimes called “monuments” in lean lingo) must be moved, however, the initial costs can be high to the point where cells are not feasible.[27]
There are a number of possible limitations to implementing cellular manufacturing. Some argue that cellular manufacturing can lead to a decrease in production flexibility.[17] Cells are typically designed to maintain a specific flow volume of parts being produced. Should the demand or necessary quantity decrease, the cells may have to be realigned to match the new requirements, which is a costly operation, and one not typically required in other manufacturing setups.[17]
See also[edit]

Cross-training (business)
World class manufacturing

References[edit]



^ a b c d e f g h Liker, Jeffery (2004). The Toyota Way. New York: McGraw Hill. pp. 31, 96–101. 
^ 5. Flanders, R.E. 1925. Design, manufacture, and production control of a standard machine. Transactions of ASME, Vol. 26, 691-738.
^ 6. Mitrofanov, S.P. 1959. The scientific principles of group technology. Leningrad (trans. By J.L. Grayson, Birmingham University).
^ 4. Burbidge, J.L. 1975. The Introduction to Group Technology. New York: John Wiley.
^ Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 20
^ 7. Hall, Robert W. 1983. Zero Inventories. Homewood, Ill., Dow Jones-Irwin. pp 120-126
^ 8. Harmon, R.L., and L.D. Peterson. 1990. Reinventing the Factory: Productivity Breakthroughs in Manufacturing Today. New York: Free Press. pp 118-123
^ 2. Black, J. T., and Steve L. Hunter. 2003. op. cit.
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 573-617
^ a b Morgan, J.M. (2006). The Toyota Product Development System. New York: Productivity Press. p. 97. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. p 4
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 332-338
^ 3. Hall, Robert W. 1987. op. cit., p 92
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., p 5
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 27, 136, 585-586
^ "JIT-Production." Hyvinkaa, Finland: Kone Corporation/ATF
^ a b c d e f g h Inman, R. Anthony; Helm, Marilyn (2006). Encyclopedia of Management. Detroit, MI: Gale Cengage Learning. pp. 72–78. ISBN 978-0-7876-6556-2. 
^ a b c Aalaei, Amin; Davoudpour, Hamid. "A robust optimization model for cellular manufacturing system into supply chain management". International Journal of Production Economics. doi:10.1016/j.ijpe.2016.01.014. 
^ Delgoshaei, Aidin; Ariffin, Mohd Khairol Anuar Mohd; Leman, Zulkiflle; Baharudin, B. T. Hang Tuah Bin; Gomes, Chandima (2016-01-12). "Review of evolution of cellular manufacturing system’s approaches: Material transferring models". International Journal of Precision Engineering and Manufacturing. 17 (1): 131–149. ISSN 2234-7593. doi:10.1007/s12541-016-0017-9. 
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit. Chapter 10: Cost Accounting and Cellular Manufacturing, pp 281-310)
^ Frecka, Thomas J. Accounting for Manufacturing Productivity: A Set of Papers from an AME Meeting--Problems and Directions in Cost Accounting. Association for Manufacturing Excellence, 2nd Printing. Several of the 11 articles in this report pertain to changes in cost accounting stemming from JIT production, and cells in particular.
^ 9. Sheridan, John L. 2000. “Lean Sigma synergy,” Industry Week (October 16) pp 81-82.
^ 10. 2005 Shingo Prize website.
^ 11. Levasseur, Gerls A., Marilyn M. Helms, and Aleisha A. Zink. 1995. “A Conversion from a functional to a cellular manufacturing layout at Steward, Inc. Production and Inventory Management. 3rd quarter, pp 37-42.
^ Tonkin, Lea A.P. 1992. Hughes Ground Systems Group Takes Aim at Defects, Delays. Target (May–June). pp 25-27
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op. cit., pp 225-232
^ 1. Hyer, Nancy, and Urban Wemmerlöv. 2002. op cit., pp 519-521



Further reading[edit]

Anbumalar, V.; Raja Chandra Sekar, M (December 2015). "METHODS FOR SOLVING CELL FORMATION, STATIC LAYOUT AND DYNAMIC LAYOUT CELLULAR MANUFACTURING SYSTEM PROBLEMS: A REVIEW" (PDF). Asian Journal of Science and Technology.
Black, J. T. (1991). The Design of the Factory with a Future, New York, NY: McGraw-Hill, Inc., 1991.
Black, J. T. (2000). 'Lean Manufacturing Implementation', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 177-86.
Burbidge, J.L. (1978), The Principles of Production Control, MacDonald and Evans, England, ISBN 0-7121-1676-1.
Brandon, John. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing: Integrating Technology and Management, Somerset, England: Research Studies Press LTD.
Feld, William M., (2001). Lean Manufacturing: tools, techniques, and how to use them, Boca Raton, FL; Alexandria, VA: St. Lucie Press; Apics.
Hyer, N.; Brown, K.A. 2003. Work cells with staying power: lessons for process-complete operations. California Management Review 46/1 (Fall): 37-52.
Houshyar, A. Nouri; Leman, Z; Pakzad Moghadam, H; Sulaiman, R (August 2014). "Review on Cellular Manufacturing System and its Components". International Journal of Engineering and Advanced Technology (IJEAT).
İşlier, Attila (2015-01-01). "Cellular Manufacturing Systems: Organization, Trends And Innovative Methods". Alphanumeric Journal 3 (2). ISSN 2148-2225
Irani, Shahrukh. (1999). Handbook of Cellular Manufacturing Systems, New York, NY: John Wiley & Sons, Inc., 1999.
Kannan, V.R. 1996. A virtual cellular manufacturing approach to batch production. Decision Sciences. 27 (3), 519-539.
McLean, C.R., H.M. Bloom, and T.H. Hopp. 1982. The virtual manufacturing cell. Proceedings of the Fourth IFAC/IFIP Conference on Information Control Problems in Manufacturing Technology. Gaithersburg, Md. (October).
Singh, Nanua and Divakar Rajamani. (1996). Cellular Manufacturing Systems Design, Planning and Control, London, UK: Chapman & Hall.
Schonberger, R.J. 2004. Make work cells work for you. Quality Progress 3/74 (April 2004): 58-63.
Swamdimass, Paul M. and Darlow, Neil R. (2000). 'Manufacturing Strategy', in Paul M. Swamidass (ed.), Innovations in competitive manufacturing, Boston, Mass.; London: Kluwer Academic, 17-24.







v
t
e


Lean manufacturing tools






Cellular manufacturing
Takt time
Standardized work
Continuous-flow manufacturing
Kanban
5 Whys
Single-Minute Exchange of Die
Poka-yoke
Production leveling
Total productive maintenance
5S (methodology)
PDCA









Authority control



NDL: 01007879










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Cellular_manufacturing&oldid=783215872"					
Categories: Lean manufacturingProcess managementManufacturingProduction and manufacturingCommercial item transport and distributionManagementInventoryHidden categories: Articles with too few wikilinks from July 2015All articles with too few wikilinksArticles covered by WikiProject Wikify from July 2015All articles covered by WikiProject Wikify 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschEspañolNederlands日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 31 May 2017, at 21:12.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Insider Trading - Feld William M. - Form 4 SEC Filings












Home |
Archives |
Products |
About |
Contact |
FAQ |



New User?
Sign Up | 
Sign In









Form 4 Filings


Insider Buys


Significant Buys


Penny StocksInsider Buying


Insider Sales




Insider Buy Sell Ratios


Stock Options


Insider TradingStock Screener


Insider TradingGraph View


Insider Watch





Sec Filings Insider Trading - Feld William M.





Select Time period: 
1 Month
2 Months
3 Months
6 Months
1 Year
2 Years
3 Years
4 Years
All Data
 

     



google

   



yahoo!



Send this page to:  

Blog
  



Digg

  



Reddit

  



Facebook

  



Stumble

  



del.icio.us








Enter Stock Ticker Symbol or Cik:




Cik Lookup...






Search By Company or Insider Name:







"Insiders might sell their shares for any number of reasons, but they buy them for only one:
they think the price will rise"
- Peter Lynch ==>>

What is insider trading>>



Email a friend >>...







Historical filings delayed by 6 months. New user?
Sign Up for real time data.
Existing user?
Sign In

Common stock purchase or sale:



TransactionDate
ReportedDate
Company
Symbol
InsiderRelationship
SharesTraded
AveragePrice
TotalAmount
SharesOwned
Filing




2015-12-07Sale
2016-01-074:01 pm
Lydall Inc
LDL
Feld William M.VP/GM T/A - Fibers
2,000
$35.34
$70,679
17,730(Direct)
View




Stock options: Exercise, Award, Grant, Conversion



TransactionDate
ReportedDate
ExercisableExpiration
Company
Symnbol
InsiderRelationship
SharesTraded
ConversionPrice
SharesOwned
Filing




2016-12-09Option Award
2016-12-132:56 pm
N/AN/A
Lydall Inc
LDL
Feld William M.VP/GM T/A - Fibers
1,560
$0
18,825(Direct)
View


2016-12-09Option Award
2016-12-132:56 pm
2017-12-092026-12-08
Lydall Inc
LDL
Feld William M.VP/GM T/A - Fibers
3,860
$64.2
18,825(Direct)
View


2016-12-06Tax Withholding
2016-12-0810:43 am
N/AN/A
Lydall Inc
LDL
Feld William M.VP/GM T/A - Fibers
465
$61.95
17,265(Direct)
View


2015-12-04Option Award
2015-12-084:16 pm
N/AN/A
Lydall Inc
LDL
Feld William M.VP/GM T/A - Fibers
2,730
$0
19,730(Direct)
View


2015-12-04Option Award
2015-12-084:16 pm
2016-12-042025-12-03
Lydall Inc
LDL
Feld William M.VP/GM T/A - Fibers
6,600
$36.74
19,730(Direct)
View









    © 2005-2017 SecForm4.Com All rights reserved.
    Archives:
    2017 2016 2015 2014 2013 2012 ... 
    Fri, 28 Jul 2017 12:25:15 -0500
  

    SEC is the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. EDGAR is a trademark of the SEC.
    SecForm4.Com is not affiliated with or approved by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).
Terms of Use |
    Privacy Statement |
  











Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them - William M Feld - Google BooksMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsBooksbooks.google.com - There are some very good books available that explain the Lean Manufacturing theory and touch on implementing its techniques. However, you cannot learn "how to be" lean from merely reading the theory. And to be successful in the real-work environment you need a clear comprehension of how lean techniques...https://books.google.com/books/about/Lean_Manufacturing.html?id=zM_qqlrHKJ8C&utm_source=gb-gplus-shareLean ManufacturingMy libraryHelpAdvanced Book SearchView eBookGet this book in printAmazon.comBarnes&Noble.comBooks-A-MillionIndieBoundAll sellers »Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use ThemWilliam M FeldCRC Press, Sep 28, 2000 - Business & Economics - 248 pages 1 Reviewhttps://books.google.com/books/about/Lean_Manufacturing.html?id=zM_qqlrHKJ8CThere are some very good books available that explain the Lean Manufacturing theory and touch on implementing its techniques. However, you cannot learn "how to be" lean from merely reading the theory. And to be successful in the real-work environment you need a clear comprehension of how lean techniques work, rather than just a remote understanding of what they are. You need to know what does and does not work in different situations. And you need the benefit of practical experience in their implementation.Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them gives you the benefit of author and practitioner William Feld's 15 years of hands-on experience - and the lessons he's learned. Feld provides insight into the appropriate use of assessment, analysis, design, and, most importantly, deployment of a successful lean manufacturing program. Packed with practical advice and tips but not bogged down in theory, this book covers how, why, when, and what to do while implementing lean manufacturing. It equips you with the tools and techniques you need along with an understanding of how and why they work. Feld explores why an integrated approach is so much more beneficial in securing sustained improvement. He focuses on the interdependency of the Five Primary Elements: organization, metrics, logistics, manufacturing flow, and process control. He describes a proven, applied approach to creating a lean program using these elements. To keep up globally, and even locally, your manufacturing operation must be responsive, flexible, predictable, and consistent. You must continually improve manufacturing operations and cultivate a self directed work force driven by output based, customer performance criteria. By applying what you learn from Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them you can build a workforce - and an organization - with the capacity to satisfy world class expectations now and into the future. What people are saying - Write a reviewUser Review -  Flag as inappropriateGood balanced view that takes into account  that any company is multi-dimensional in how it does what it does - all too often advocates of lean take a simplistic single piece flow alongside a value-stream viewpoint.  This book looks at how the contraints of organisation (people and product) and logistics add difficulties when contending with high level senior management desires to 'implement lean practices' - worth reading in order to help form a balanced view. Other editions - View allLean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use ThemWilliam M FeldLimited preview - 2000Lean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use Them, Parts 2-4William M FeldNo preview available - 2001References to this bookEssentials of Inventory ManagementMax MullerNo preview available - 2003Simulation-based Lean Six-Sigma and Design for Six-SigmaBasem El-Haik,Raid Al-AomarLimited preview - 2006All Book Search results &raquo; Bibliographic informationTitleLean Manufacturing: Tools, Techniques, and How to Use ThemResource ManagementAuthorWilliam M FeldEditionillustratedPublisherCRC Press, 2000ISBN1420025538, 9781420025538Length248 pagesSubjectsBusiness & Economics › Industries › ManufacturingBusiness & Economics / Industries / ManufacturingTechnology & Engineering / Engineering (General)Technology & Engineering / Manufacturing&nbsp&nbspExport CitationBiBTeX EndNote RefManAbout Google Books - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service - Blog - Information for Publishers - Report an issue - Help - Sitemap - Google Home


William M. Feld (Author of Lean Manufacturing)























































Sign InJoin












Discover new books on Goodreads


See if your friends have read any of William M. Feld's books





Sign in with Facebook


Sign in  options




Join Goodreads















William M. Feld’s FollowersNone yet.















William M. Feld





edit data




Combine EditionsWilliam M. Feld's Books

William M. Feld

      Average rating:
      3.33




    · 
      6
     ratings
    · 
      0
     reviews
    · 1 distinct work
    · Similar authors









 


Lean Manufacturing
 

 3.33 avg rating — 6 ratings
            —
              published
             2000
            —
            3 editions
















Want to Read
saving…

















Want to Read




Currently Reading




Read








Error rating book. Refresh and try again.

Rate this book
Clear rating
1 of 5 stars2 of 5 stars3 of 5 stars4 of 5 stars5 of 5 stars






    * Note: these are all the books on Goodreads for this author. To add more, click here.

    



Upcoming Events

       			No scheduled events.
    				Add an event.

 


      Is this you? Let us know. If not, help out and invite William to Goodreads.















©
2017
Goodreads Inc




about us


advertise


author program


jobs


api


our blog


authors & advertisers blog


terms


privacy


help


switch to:
mobile version















Welcome back. Just a moment while we sign you in to your Goodreads account.














